BOOK ? WHITE CORPUS
Chapter 1: The Watchers
The mall stood in silence, vast and cavernous, a monument to ambition and failure. The towering glass windows, long since cracked and smeared, cast faint reflections on the pristine marble floors that stretched endlessly. The hum of fluorescent lights filled the emptiness, their flickering a low, rhythmic pulse. Outside, the world moved on without it, leaving the mall to its own devices—forgotten, abandoned, but still standing.

Inside, three night watchmen made their rounds, moving through the labyrinth of corridors, their footsteps echoing louder than usual in the hollowed-out space. They didn’t mind the emptiness. It was just part of the job. The mall had been closed for years, and they were the last line of defense. A few loose papers scattered here and there, the occasional over-enthusiastic janitor still doing their rounds, but for the most part, the place was empty.

"Everything good on your end, Brett?" Alex’s voice crackled through the radio, static fuzzing out the silence as she passed a row of abandoned stores. Her flashlight swept over the dark storefronts, the beams of light slicing through the darkness like knives. Nothing moved.

"Yeah, just the usual. You?" Brett’s voice came through clear. He was at the far side of the mall, standing by a security booth that hadn’t been used in over five years. He could barely remember why the booth had been there in the first place—it certainly wasn’t functional now.

"Nothing. Same. I’m doing a check by the food court now," Alex said, her boots echoing as she walked past the eerie, unmanned food stalls. The mall was a relic, a ghost town.

In the control room, Sean sat in front of the row of security monitors. Six cameras, all that remained of a once-thriving security system, blinked like sleepy eyes. He flicked through the screens lazily, the images flashing with static. There was nothing to see. Nothing to report.

But then again, that was the job. Watch. Report if needed. Keep the place locked down.

He took a sip of his lukewarm coffee, eyes flicking over the feeds again. For a moment, he thought he saw something move on the northeast side of the mall—just a shadow, brief and fleeting. But he’d been staring at these same screens for too long. His mind played tricks.

He keyed the radio. "Got anything on your end?"

There was a pause, then Alex's voice: "Same as usual, Sean. Just...empty."

"Right. Keep your eyes peeled."

Character Introductions
The trio was hardly a cohesive team. There was Alex, the older one, who had been doing security for years. She had a sharp eye and a quiet demeanor, her years of experience making her more skeptical of the supernatural rumors that had started swirling around the mall. Then there was Brett, the youngest member of the team—handsome, cocky, but still learning the ropes. He’d been on the job for just a few months, eager to prove himself, but still a bit too green to fully understand the weight of being in a place like this. And then there was Sean, the technician, who ran the monitors and had an almost supernatural ability to stay awake despite the late hours and mind-numbing routine. He was the one who’d been there the longest, but he didn’t talk about why.

They had been rotating in shifts for months, the three of them working together through the quiet, slow hours of the night. It wasn’t hard to get used to the isolation, but there was a subtle discomfort that lingered. Even though it was just the three of them on this shift, there was an overwhelming sense of being watched. But they didn’t talk about it. They just went about their rounds, each lost in their own thoughts.

The Unseen Threat
As Alex moved closer to the food court, a flicker of something in the corner of her eye caught her attention—a shadow darting across one of the shop windows. Her heart rate quickened, but she shook her head, dismissing it. Probably just the dim lighting or the tiredness starting to set in.

But the feeling didn’t go away.

She pressed her hand against the glass of a closed store, checking to make sure everything was secure. When she pulled her hand away, a smudge of handprint—still faint—remained. It was like someone had been standing there, watching.

"Everything alright, Alex?" Brett's voice came through again.

She keyed the mic, keeping her voice even. "Yeah. Just checking things."

The radio crackled again. "You should head back soon. Graveyard shift’s coming up."

"Will do," she responded, though she didn’t feel ready to leave just yet. Something about the air in the mall felt thick, suffocating, like something was waiting. The quiet wasn’t natural. And for the first time in a long while, she felt a chill.

As she turned to head back, the overhead lights flickered. For a moment, the entire mall seemed to tremble—just a brief vibration, like a deep hum beneath the floors. She stopped, holding her breath, listening.

Nothing.

She continued on, but now, her every step felt louder. More deliberate.

Shifting Dynamics
By the time the graveyard shift began, there were already three new guards entering the building. Dave, Claire, and Tom, each bringing their own set of anxieties and curiosities. Unlike the original trio, they were fresh on the job, and none of them quite understood the eerie nature of the mall yet.

They exchanged quiet pleasantries as they made their rounds, unaware of the strange events that had already begun. But as the night deepened, so did the stillness. The shadows grew darker. The corners seemed to loom more heavily, and the security monitors began to flicker.

It was only a matter of time before the real haunting began.

This opening sets the stage for the mall’s haunting presence, creating a sense of eerie normalcy while introducing the night watchmen as they patrol through their shifts. It establishes the space, the characters, and the slow-burn tension of the supernatural beginning to leak through the cracks. The relationship between the guards will evolve, with trust, suspicion, and fear mixing as they realize they’re not just guarding an abandoned mall—they’re guarding something much more dangerous.

What do you think? Does this capture the eerie, slow-building atmosphere you’re imagining for the first chapter?






Chapter 2: The Layout
The mall was massive. Bigger than anything any of them had ever worked before. Six floors, hundreds of stores, food courts, service corridors—there were even areas that nobody had stepped foot in for years. Officially, the mall was “closed,” but in reality, it felt more like a city within a city. It was its own world, vast and sprawling, a monument to a time when shopping was an experience, not a chore.

Brett, Alex, and Sean had long since memorized the map of the place. Still, there was a strange comfort in walking through its familiar halls, checking in on the spaces where the public used to crowd.

The mall's first floor was the grandest—an open expanse with a long atrium, high glass ceilings that allowed light to filter through. Large department stores lined the edges, their oversized signs collecting dust. In the center was the food court, now empty, but once alive with the sounds of chatter and the sizzling of fast food vendors. Beyond the food court, a massive fountain, once a centerpiece of social life, stood dry, its cracked basin a grim reminder of the mall’s decline.

On the second floor, a sprawling entertainment complex had once included a cinema, arcades, and a few boutique stores. Now, it was mostly dark, save for the occasional flicker of faulty lights. The arcade machines were abandoned, their screens faded and cracked. The cinema area felt haunted in its silence, like something waiting to happen but never quite arriving.

The third floor, typically the most active, was now eerily vacant. It contained smaller shops, electronics outlets, and a few luxury brands that had gone out of business over the years. The ceilings here were lower, giving it a more claustrophobic feel than the open spaces on the lower levels.

The fourth and fifth floors were the last bastions of the mall’s original purpose: a combination of specialty stores, a few remaining department stores, and offices that hadn’t been occupied in years. Those floors were rarely accessed by anyone except the night watchmen, and even then, it was mostly a formality.

The sixth floor was a complete mystery to them. It had been closed off long before any of the guards arrived. No one had ever ventured up there, and the locked doors seemed like the kind of thing that wasn’t worth worrying about—until now.

A Night Watchman's Routine
Each night, the trio followed their routine. Brett liked to start by checking the first floor, making sure the food court and main hall were secure. Alex, the more methodical of the group, would cover the second and third floors, running her flashlight along the dimly lit corridors and occasionally checking the service areas behind the stores. Sean, in charge of the cameras, remained at the control room, monitoring the entire mall from the bank of screens in front of him.

Their radios buzzed as they checked in with one another.

"First floor clear," Brett said, his voice crackling in the radio.

"Second floor, still good," Alex replied.

"Nothing unusual on the cameras," Sean added.

It was quiet. Too quiet. But that was what they had grown used to. The radio calls were routine, but each one, each check-in, was a little reassurance that everything was still fine. There were no disturbances. The mall was exactly as it had been the night before—empty.

Hints of Something Wrong
But in the back of their minds, there were questions that none of them dared ask aloud.

Why had the mall been built in the first place? Why had they spent so much money on something that was now all but abandoned? It had been built during the peak of mall culture, and now, it felt like a relic—a tomb. The strange sense of unease wasn’t helped by the unshakable feeling that something didn’t quite add up.

It wasn’t just the mall itself. There were the cameras, too—monitors that sometimes picked up static for no reason. Every so often, Sean would see a flicker of movement on one of the cameras, only to realize it was just a bird or some shadow from the high rafters. Still, each time, he couldn’t shake the feeling that something was lurking in the corners of the screens.

"I swear I saw something move by the fountain," Brett said as he walked past the dry fountain on the first floor, his flashlight cutting through the shadows.

Alex didn’t respond at first, but the hairs on the back of her neck stood up. It’s just the lights, she told herself. But there was something about the way the mall’s shadows stretched that made her uncomfortable. The way the darkness seemed to linger a bit too long in certain places.

A Final Check
The three guards checked in one final time as their shifts started to come to an end. The normal quiet of the night returned after a while, but the feeling of being watched lingered, like a distant memory of something forgotten. It was hard to shake off. It wasn’t just the mall itself—it was the weird, creeping sensation that they weren’t as alone as they thought they were.

"All clear?" Sean asked into the radio, just as the last of his shift began to tick by.

"Yeah," Alex replied. "But I keep thinking I saw something in the corner of my eye. The fountain, again."

Brett chuckled. "Must be the lighting, right?"

"Yeah," Alex said, but her voice trailed off. "But maybe... maybe not."

This chapter introduces the setting and establishes the daily routine of the night watchmen, giving readers a sense of what life is like in the empty, sprawling mall. The mystery of the mall’s construction and its eerie, silent atmosphere is subtly hinted at, but nothing truly supernatural is revealed yet. There are strange moments—shadows that don’t seem to move like they should, flickers on the security cameras—but they are left ambiguous, adding a sense of discomfort without giving away too much.

Does this approach feel right for the pace you want to set? Keeping things grounded while still hinting at the unease building beneath the surface?





Chapter 2: The Graveyard Shift
The mall’s vast, empty corridors seemed to stretch endlessly in all directions. Brett, Alex, and Sean had done their rounds, checking every corner and scanning the empty storefronts. Their shift had nearly ended, and the quiet hum of the overhead lights was a comfort to them now. The hours had passed quickly, filled with the dull routine of watching the flickering monitors and patrolling the cold hallways. The hum of the radio and the occasional static was a rhythm they’d come to rely on, a sound that made the emptiness seem normal.

Brett adjusted his jacket, already tired but unwilling to admit it. "You feel like we're being watched yet?"

Alex gave him a side-eye but didn’t respond. Instead, she glanced at the monitors. Sean’s eyes never strayed from the camera feeds, his fingers idly flicking through them, pausing for only a brief moment on any unusual flickers. He wasn’t sure whether the weird feelings that had started nagging at him were due to the darkness or if something really was off.

"You sure we’ve checked everything, Alex?" Sean asked, breaking the silence. "The back storage rooms, the service hallways? Everything locked down?"

Alex nodded, her flashlight cutting through the dark. "Yeah, everything’s good. Same as last night."

A crackling sound on the radio interrupted them. "It’s time," came a voice—Dave’s. "We’re here for the shift change."

Alex exhaled and keyed the mic. "Roger that, Dave. We’re heading to the security room."

The trio made their way to the security room, moving through the now-familiar path of darkened corridors. The mall’s vastness was imposing as they moved through the underbelly of the building. For a moment, Brett paused, a thought crossing his mind that didn’t sit right. He looked back down the dark hallways but saw nothing but empty stores.

Alex’s voice broke the silence. "Stop trying to scare yourself, Brett. It’s just the place getting to you."

He grinned awkwardly. "Yeah, maybe."

They arrived at the security room, where Dave, Claire, and Tom were already settling in. Dave was flicking through the security feeds, Claire was leaning back in her chair, arms folded, eyes half-lidded from lack of sleep, and Tom was sorting through papers, clearly trying to stay busy.

"Everything clear so far?" Alex asked as she handed over the radio.

"Yeah, nothing unusual," Dave replied, glancing up briefly. "Just the usual creepy quiet. You guys have a good shift?"

"Same as always," Sean muttered. "Uneventful. Just the flickering cameras and shadows."

"Shadows? Here? I’m not surprised," Claire said, stifling a yawn. "This place gives me the creeps."

"See you tomorrow night," Alex said, as she and Brett stepped out, leaving the others to settle in.

Shift Change
Now it was 3:00 AM. Brett, Alex, and Sean were off-duty, while Dave, Claire, and Tom took over. The tension of the first shift carried over, lingering in the silence. The new team settled into their routine quickly, though there was a noticeable difference in energy.

Tom, the newest of the group, seemed more anxious than usual. His eyes darted from screen to screen, his fingers tapping the desk nervously. Claire, ever the skeptic, didn’t acknowledge his discomfort. She had learned not to let her nerves get to her, even if the mall's eerie emptiness sometimes made her uneasy.

"Let’s just get through this shift," Claire said, trying to sound upbeat. "The faster we get through, the faster we get out of here."

Tom nodded, still fidgeting. He was already learning to hate the cold emptiness of the mall. At least when there were people around, there was noise. Now, there was only the occasional hum of the old lights and the faint whir of the security monitors.

"You good, Tom?" Dave asked, catching the young guard’s restlessness.

"Yeah, just... getting a little jumpy," Tom muttered. "It’s just... so quiet in here."

"It’s always like this," Claire chimed in. "Don’t worry, we’ll get used to it."

They began their rounds, splitting up across the mall to check the various floors. Dave took the second floor, Claire headed to the first, and Tom reluctantly moved to the third.

As they walked through the dimly lit corridors, the mall seemed even more vast and desolate at night. The flickering overhead lights, the endless rows of stores, and the empty food court gave everything a ghostly quality. Tom’s flashlight cast long shadows that seemed to stretch unnaturally, bending and swaying with every step. The silence was oppressive, and every little sound—footsteps echoing, the hum of the air conditioning—sounded louder than it should.

But nothing seemed wrong. The security checks were routine. Empty storefronts. Locked doors. The steady hum of the air conditioning.

Still, something lingered in the air, something that Tom couldn’t quite place. It wasn’t fear, but a deep, gnawing sense of wrongness.

Hints of Unease
Tom's flashlight suddenly flickered. He cursed under his breath and tapped it, but it didn’t come back on. Grabbing a spare one from his belt, he moved on. But as he reached the end of the hallway, a sound stopped him dead in his tracks—a soft, almost imperceptible scraping sound. It wasn’t the usual noises that the building made. It was too rhythmic, too deliberate.

Tom paused and turned his flashlight towards the source of the sound. Nothing. The hall was empty.

Just the building settling, he told himself. But it didn’t feel like that. His breath caught in his chest, and for a moment, he felt like he wasn’t alone.

He keyed the radio, trying to sound calm. "Hey, did anyone else hear that?"

Claire’s voice crackled through, cutting the tension. "What, Tom?"

"Scraping. I thought I heard something down the hall."

"Probably just the pipes," Claire answered, her voice nonchalant. "Everything’s fine. Get back to the rounds, Tom."

He hesitated. "Yeah. Okay. Just... weird."

He moved deeper into the darkened space, his eyes scanning the hallway. But the sound had stopped, and everything was still again.

This chapter transitions smoothly between the two shifts, providing a sense of normalcy and routine before we start introducing little moments of unease. We don’t reveal the hollow yet, but we give hints that something might be wrong in the way the building feels, the way the guards interact with it, and the way the silence seems to hold weight. This way, the tension can grow slowly over time, building toward the eventual reveal.

How does this feel? Are we keeping the pacing right, with just enough tension to make the audience uneasy but without revealing too much too soon?






Chapter 3: Dawn’s Light
The second shift had started without incident, and the mall seemed even more silent than before. The quiet of the graveyard shift was a stark contrast to the bustling day it once saw, now reduced to its skeletal form. The faint buzz of electricity and the steady hum of the ventilation system were the only sounds that remained, and even they felt oddly comforting.

Dave, Claire, and Tom went about their rounds methodically, each one settling into their own rhythm as the minutes dragged on. The vast, empty spaces seemed to stretch further in the dead of night, but there was an odd sense of normalcy to it, too—this was their world now. The emptiness had become routine, the dull, mechanical walk through each floor, up and down the aisles, over and over again.

They moved through the food court first. The rows of empty chairs and tables lined up like ghosts, waiting for customers that would never come. It was the least interesting part of the job, and the least unnerving. Here, the wide-open space felt peaceful, with the distant, pale glow of the emergency lights adding an almost serene effect.

"Anything on your end, Claire?" Dave’s voice was steady as he made his way to the opposite side of the floor, casting his flashlight over the rusted, unused food stands.

"Nope. Same as before. All quiet here," Claire replied, her tone flat as she walked through the rows of abandoned kiosks. The fluorescent lights flickered briefly, but they had done that a thousand times before. It was just the building, nothing more.

The echoes of their footsteps carried across the empty court. Tom adjusted his flashlight, glancing back over his shoulder as they moved further down the hall. "You guys ever feel like... we’ve been here too long?"

"That’s just how it is," Claire said, shrugging as she passed him. "I get it too. It’s just... the same thing, night after night."

Tom wasn’t so sure. There was something about the mall that didn’t sit right with him. He tried to shake the feeling, to write it off as fatigue. The mall was, after all, just a building. A vast, impersonal structure meant to store things, and people. But he couldn’t help but wonder if the place felt... wrong somehow. The walls seemed to close in just a little too much when no one was around.

They walked past a series of darkened stores on the second floor, where the glass was covered in dust, and the steel security gates were down, sealing off spaces that no one had visited in years. Claire’s footsteps slowed as she passed a familiar storefront—one that had been untouched for ages. She paused, staring blankly at the faded signs on the window.

"Everything alright, Claire?" Dave asked, noticing the change in her pace.

"Yeah," she said, breaking her gaze away and continuing on. "Just thinking."

"Thinking about what?" Tom asked, sensing a slight edge in her tone.

She glanced at him, a small, tight smile tugging at her lips. "About how weird it is that this place even exists. I mean... it’s a giant shell now. Empty. And we’re just... here, keeping it safe for no reason."

Tom nodded slowly, realizing that he agreed with her, even if he didn’t quite know how to articulate it. "Yeah. It’s strange. It doesn’t even feel like a mall anymore."

The conversation trailed off as they moved on. The silence of the space seemed to settle back in. The feeling that something should be happening—anything—crept over them, but they quickly dismissed it.

They passed the movie theater, the large dark room full of forgotten posters and crumbling seats, and then they reached the top floor. Dave’s radio buzzed with static, breaking the stillness of the night.

"How’s it going down there?" Sean’s voice crackled through. "All clear?"

"All clear," Claire answered, briefly scanning the screens on her end. "Nothing unusual. Just... empty."

They all agreed to finish their rounds and meet back in the security room for the final check before their shift ended. As they walked, the familiar labyrinth of corridors opened up before them again, the neon signs flickering in their peripheral vision, almost as if the mall itself were beginning to feel as empty as it truly was.

Time Worn and Passing
As the hours dragged on, the mall seemed to sink deeper into the quiet. The first light of dawn slowly crept through the dirty windows, casting long shadows across the polished floors. The once-fluorescent-lit space took on a softer, almost nostalgic quality in the early morning light—faded, but still standing.

Dave, Claire, and Tom returned to the security room. The hum of the monitors was oddly soothing as they took their places, checking the final feeds before their shift was over.

The clock on the wall ticked steadily toward 9:00 AM.

"How’s the next shift looking?" Dave asked, pulling the empty coffee mug toward him, though there wasn’t any coffee left. The entire room smelled faintly of stale air and machinery.

"Same as usual," Claire said, rubbing her eyes. "Nothing to report."

Tom leaned back in his chair, the weight of the night finally hitting him. "I don’t know, guys... I can’t shake the feeling that something’s going to happen soon."

"Yeah, I’ve been feeling it too," Dave admitted, glancing up from his screen. "But what are we gonna do? Just get through the shift. We’re paid to stay here. Doesn’t matter how creepy it feels."

And so they did, watching the clock tick down to the end of their shift. When 9:00 AM finally arrived, they stood, stretching their stiff limbs, ready for the day team to come in and relieve them.

"See you guys tomorrow night," Dave said, his voice a bit louder now that the stress of the shift was finally over.

Claire nodded, packing up her things. "Take care. Get some sleep. Don’t let this place get to you."

Tom lingered for a moment, his eyes scanning the monitors one last time. He couldn't shake the nagging feeling that something was off, but he pushed it down. He had to—there was nothing to fear here, not yet.

The trio exited the security room, leaving the mall behind them as they stepped out into the early morning light, the shift now officially over.

As the doors closed behind them, the mall settled back into its stillness.

End of the Shift
The chapter closes as their shift ends, and while the guards have begun to leave, the eerie stillness remains. Nothing overtly spooky happens in this chapter—it’s all about the buildup. We’re building toward the sense that something is coming, but for now, everything remains too quiet—normal, even mundane.

Does this feel like the right pacing? Keeping the tension subtle and letting the mundanity of their job carry the weight, while slowly creeping toward something darker?






Chapter 4: Night Two
The second night began much like the first, but the storm outside seemed to amplify the feeling of isolation that already hung heavily in the air. The sky had darkened long before the evening shift began, and the distant rumble of thunder echoed through the air as the first drops of rain began to fall. By the time Brett, Alex, and Sean arrived at the mall, the rain had turned into a torrential downpour, hammering against the glass windows and filling the air with the sound of water against metal and concrete.

Inside, the mall was still, almost eerily so, but it felt different tonight—more oppressive, as if the storm outside was trying to break through the walls. The lights hummed in the background, flickering now and then with the occasional surge of static, but for the most part, the mall was just as it had been the night before—quiet, still, and abandoned.

Alex was the first to arrive, her boots clicking against the floor as she made her way toward the security room. She had seen the weather report earlier in the day and had been dreading the storm all evening. There was something about a storm like this—violent and unpredictable—that made the vast, empty expanse of the mall feel even more unnerving.

The rain slammed against the roof like a drum, the occasional lightning flash lighting up the horizon. The sounds outside were amplified inside the mall, making the emptiness feel more pronounced. Alex glanced up at the dimly flickering lights overhead as she walked through the corridors, the shadows stretching long and unnaturally.

"Alright, we're here," Brett’s voice crackled through the radio. "Headed to the first floor now. Everything good?"

"Just checking in," Alex responded. "The storm’s bad tonight. I’ll meet you at the security room."

As she entered the security room, she found Brett and Sean already settling in for the night. The monitors were all active, but there was little to see. Everything seemed fine.

"Quiet so far," Brett said as he sat down, pulling a chair close to one of the cameras. "Feels like a storm's gonna roll in."

"Yeah, no kidding," Alex replied, checking the cameras briefly. "I don’t like how much louder the rain makes it in here. It's like the whole mall is vibrating with it."

Sean adjusted the volume on the monitors, his eyes scanning the feeds with little interest. "Nothing’s changed from last night. Same empty mall, same quiet halls."

The three of them settled into their routine. The storm raged on outside, but inside, the mall was as still as ever. They took turns walking the various floors, but the tasks were simple, methodical, and uneventful.

Routine Under the Storm
Brett made his way down the main corridor of the first floor, the sound of his boots on the polished floor the only noise breaking the silence. He passed the same stores, checked the same locked doors, and made the same rounds he’d done the night before. The mall felt just as lifeless, just as hollow. The only difference was the storm—its furious pounding against the building like a relentless reminder that the world outside was full of energy and life, while the mall remained unmoved.

"How are things looking down there?" Alex’s voice crackled through Brett’s radio.

"Same as usual," Brett replied, his voice distant. "Empty."

He continued his rounds, the sound of the storm growing louder with every step. Every now and then, the wind would howl against the building, shaking the windows slightly. Brett couldn’t help but feel a little unnerved, even though he told himself it was just the storm. The wind rattled the mall’s exterior like something was trying to break in, but the walls held firm.

The Odd Normalcy
Alex passed through the food court on the second floor, pausing for a moment to glance at the empty chairs and dusty countertops. The food court had once been the heart of the mall, bustling with people and noise, but now it was just a hollow shell, empty of life. The dull, flickering overhead lights only added to the eerie quiet, casting long shadows on the tables below.

As she walked, her thoughts wandered. There was something unsettling about being here again. She had been a security guard long enough to get used to the quiet, but something about the mall’s emptiness tonight felt different. The air was heavy, thick with the pressure of the storm outside, as though the building itself was holding its breath.

She couldn’t shake the feeling that something was watching her.

Alex pushed the thought away. Just the storm, she reminded herself. The wind rattled the windows once again, a gust so loud it almost sounded like a low growl.

She reached the end of the hall and turned back toward the security room, shaking off the chill that had settled in her spine. It was just the storm. She would be fine.

The Storm’s Hold
As the night wore on, the storm only seemed to grow fiercer. The wind howled louder, and the rain fell in sheets, hammering against the roof and windows. The flickering lights cast sharp, ghostly shadows, but the guards had grown used to the unpredictability of the weather. It wasn’t unusual for the power to flicker. They had all learned to roll with it, just like they had learned to live with the silence of the empty mall.

But it wasn’t just the storm that made the night feel different. There was an oppressive weight in the air, something that neither Brett, Alex, nor Sean could fully put their finger on. It wasn’t until they were about to check in with each other again that they realized how much the storm had changed the atmosphere.

"Everything good, Alex?" Sean asked, his voice breaking through the radio.

Alex paused, just outside the security room. She stared at the door for a moment before answering, her voice slightly uncertain. "Yeah. Everything’s fine. Just... feels strange tonight. You guys feel that?"

"Yeah," Brett replied. "It’s like the whole place is too quiet. Even with the storm outside. Like it’s holding its breath."

"Yeah, exactly," Alex muttered. She took a deep breath and pushed the door open, stepping into the security room. "Alright, let’s finish up and head out. We’ve still got a couple hours left."

They sat down for their final check. The radio crackled quietly, the only sound besides the storm. The monitors flickered as usual, but there was nothing to report. The mall was still empty, still silent. And yet, the feeling of wrongness remained.

End of the Shift
As the clock ticked toward 9:00 AM, Brett, Alex, and Sean prepared for the end of their shift. The storm had subsided slightly, but the uneasy feeling lingered. The wind still rattled the windows, but the night had stretched on, and the shift was coming to a close.

As they locked up the security room and made their way to the exit, the final hour of their shift passed uneventfully. They exchanged quiet goodbyes, ready to pass the baton to the graveyard shift crew—Dave, Claire, and Tom.

The mall seemed to settle again, its lifelessness still hanging heavy in the air, but for the first time that night, they couldn’t shake the feeling that something was waiting.

This chapter sets up the ominous atmosphere of the storm while maintaining a sense of normalcy on the surface. The routine is the same as before, but the discomfort lingers in the background, building up the tension for when things inevitably begin to shift. The hollow hasn’t made its presence known yet, but the sense that something’s not right is building.

How does this feel for pacing? Does it strike the balance you were hoping for, with the focus on the mundane while leaving a subtle sense of unease?





Chapter 5: The Second Shift
The storm raged on outside, the winds howling and the rain slamming against the windows with relentless force. But inside, the mall was eerily calm. The shift change had gone smoothly, and the atmosphere in the security room was a strange blend of familiarity and tension.

Dave, Claire, and Tom settled into their roles, each of them trying to shake off the fatigue of the long night ahead. They’d each worked the night shift at various points in the past, but tonight felt different. The storm had taken the edge off any lingering comfort they might have felt, and the weight of the mall’s emptiness seemed to settle deeper.

The sound of the rain outside, combined with the hum of the air conditioning and the occasional crackle of static on the radios, made the air inside feel thick, almost suffocating. Dave glanced at the clock. It was 3:15 AM, and the others were starting to make their rounds.

"Alright, Claire, you take the first floor again. I’ll do the second. Tom, you head up to the third and check the upper levels," Dave said, his voice steady but tinged with the faintest hint of unease.

They all nodded, a practiced choreography that had become second nature.

The Patrol Begins
Claire set off first, walking past the security room door, her flashlight illuminating the wide expanse of the first floor. The storm outside cast strange, jagged shadows across the darkened stores, and the light from her flashlight created pools of brightness in the otherwise dismal space.

The food court was still empty, the plastic chairs and tables arranged just as they had been the night before, cold and untouched. Claire made her way past the fountain, which had been dry for years. As her light flickered over the surface, the shadows seemed to stretch unnaturally across the floor, but she dismissed it as another trick of the light.

Everything was fine. Nothing had changed.

She kept walking, checking the doors and the various stores, but there was something unsettling about the silence. The mall felt too empty tonight, even more so than usual. Normally, there was at least the hum of the air conditioning or the faint buzz of the lights overhead, but tonight it felt like even the building itself had gone still, as if holding its breath.

The Shift’s Lull
Tom, meanwhile, made his way up to the third floor. The stairs creaked under his boots as he ascended, the only sound in the otherwise quiet mall. The top floor always felt the most abandoned—its small, specialty stores long since closed, the lights dimmed or entirely shut off. It was a little harder to see up here, the shadows feeling thicker, the darkness more oppressive.

He wasn’t used to feeling uneasy. He’d worked in worse places—malls that had seen real crime, the kinds of places that made you want to double-check your back every minute of every shift. But this place? This place was different. It wasn’t dangerous, not in the typical sense. It wasn’t even particularly creepy, he had to admit. It was just... off. Something about the sheer emptiness and the constant quiet made his skin crawl.

As he moved down the hall, he heard the faintest squeak under his foot—something on the floor, something out of place. He bent down to check it, but when he looked, there was nothing. Just the usual dust and debris.

Just the building settling, he thought, but he couldn’t ignore the sensation of eyes on him. The feeling of being watched.

"Everything alright, Tom?" Claire’s voice crackled through his radio.

He straightened up, a little startled. "Yeah, just checking in. Everything’s fine here. Just... the usual."

"Alright. Stay sharp," Claire said, and the radio went silent.

Tom sighed. He was overthinking things. It was just the storm. He wasn’t the first one to feel unnerved by the sounds of an old, empty building.

The Long Night
The hours passed slowly. The wind outside seemed to pick up even more, shaking the windows in their frames, and the storm raged on with little sign of stopping. It was hard to ignore the fact that the weather outside felt much more intense than it had the night before. But inside, the mall was as it had always been—vast, silent, and cold.

The rain wasn’t just a weather event. It was a constant presence. It came in waves, hitting the windows and roof with such force that it almost sounded like something was trying to break through. The mall, however, stood firm. The silence inside was comforting, even if it was starting to feel a bit unnerving.

"Alright, Claire, I’m almost done with the second floor," Dave radioed. "You finish up on your end, and we’ll meet back at the security room."

"Roger that," Claire replied. She was halfway through her rounds, checking another row of darkened stores. The lights flickered slightly as she moved down the hallway, but nothing out of the ordinary.

Shifting Perceptions
As the shift wore on, Tom couldn’t shake the feeling that something was off. The mall felt too vast, the shadows too long. The creaking of the building, the groaning of the floors underfoot—it wasn’t normal. At least, not to him. Maybe it had always been like this, but he hadn’t noticed it before.

He keyed the radio. "Hey, Claire. You ever feel like... like something’s just wrong about this place? Like it’s not just abandoned, but it’s—"

There was a brief silence before Claire’s voice answered, a little too quickly. "No. Just tired, Tom. Just the storm getting to you."

"Yeah," Tom muttered, though he wasn’t convinced. Just the storm.

The Clock Ticks On
The clock on the wall ticked steadily, and slowly, the final hour of the shift crept up on them. It was just past 8:30 AM, and the tired guards knew the end of their shift was near. The storm had begun to subside, and the usual sounds of the mall returned, the hum of the overhead lights and the soft rattle of the old ventilation system.

"Almost time to go," Dave said, rubbing his eyes. "Let’s finish up and get out of here."

Claire gave him a nod, but Tom lingered a little longer, staring out into the empty mall. He could hear the faint sound of the wind outside, but it wasn’t just the weather that was making him uneasy now. It was the quiet—too quiet. The mall felt... like it was waiting for something.

End of the Shift
The end of their shift came with the usual final check-ins and handovers. They exchanged a few quiet words with the incoming shift as they packed up their things, ready to head out. Brett, Alex, and Sean were now walking in, yawning and stretching, ready to take over for the night.

As the guards filed out of the security room, the mall fell back into its silence, the emptiness taking over once again. The storm outside had almost entirely passed, leaving behind the faintest drizzle and a fading rumble of thunder. The mall remained standing, empty, untouched—waiting.

This chapter ends the second shift for the night watchmen, keeping the focus on the mundane tasks of security work while hinting at the growing unease without revealing anything supernatural yet. The storm is the only external factor that really adds to the atmosphere, but it’s enough to leave the characters—and the readers—feeling like something is just around the corner.

How’s the pacing now? Is this direction more aligned with your vision for building up the suspense slowly?






Arcade Location: The arcade was located on the second floor of the mall, as part of the entertainment complex that also included the cinema. It’s now empty, with the machines abandoned and the area unused.

Security Cameras: There are 6 security cameras in total, and they cover the following areas:

Camera 1: First floor, near the entrance and food court area, to monitor the main hall.
Camera 2: First floor, near the fountain and the central corridor, covering a large chunk of the space.
Camera 3: Second floor, overlooking the arcade area, which is now mostly dark and abandoned.
Camera 4: Second floor, covering the entertainment complex, which includes the old cinema and various smaller shops.
Camera 5: Third floor, focusing on the smaller shops and corridors leading to the luxury and specialty stores.
Camera 6: Third floor, aimed at the service corridors and a few unused, locked-up storage areas.
These cameras are somewhat limited, especially considering the size of the mall, but they provide enough coverage for the guards to keep an eye on the more prominent areas of the mall.


Chapter 6: Night Three - The Calm Before
The storm had not relented. By the time the first shift arrived at the mall, it was just as intense as it had been the night before. The rain hammered against the windows in relentless sheets, and the wind howled outside, its furious gusts rattling the glass and creating a muffled roar that seeped into the halls. Inside, the mall felt like a dead zone, untouched by the world outside, isolated from everything. But for Brett, Alex, and Sean, this was routine. A constant, steady rhythm they had grown used to.

As they walked through the massive atrium, Brett glanced at the ceiling, watching the faint flickering of the overhead lights. It had become a sort of joke between them at this point, how the lights always flickered at random, especially during storms.

"You ever think these lights are gonna give out one night?" Brett asked, half-laughing.

"I think we’re all gonna give out long before the lights do," Sean replied, his voice dry as he checked the security monitors. His eyes didn’t leave the screens, even as Brett moved ahead.

Alex, as usual, remained quiet, her flashlight cutting through the darkness of the first floor. The food court was as empty as always, the old signage hanging loosely from the walls, all abandoned and falling apart. The fountain, once the centerpiece of the space, was nothing more than a dry, cracked basin now. She thought it strange, how nothing in this place seemed to have aged gracefully. Time had done its damage here, but it had done so quietly, as though it had been forgotten.

The guards checked in with each other regularly, the soft crackle of the radios filling the silence.

"Everything clear on your end, Alex?" Sean’s voice buzzed through.

"Yeah," Alex answered shortly. "Just the same."

Brett, walking along the long hall toward the second floor, keyed in his mic. "Food court looks good, nothing weird to report."

And so they continued, hour after hour, walking the same halls, checking the same locks. The first floor was eerily quiet, with only the hum of the mall’s air conditioning system and the occasional flicker of the lights as company.

The Storm Continues
Outside, the storm intensified. The thunder rumbled in the distance, so deep it almost felt like it was shaking the foundation of the building. Alex paused for a moment, standing near the fountain, listening to the storm. She hated how disorienting it was, how loud it became. Even though she knew it was just weather, there was something about the power of it that made the vast emptiness of the mall feel even more profound.

"You alright?" Brett asked, seeing her pause.

Alex gave a short nod. "Yeah, just listening. It’s hard not to feel like the storm's trying to get in."

Brett chuckled. "Yeah, I’ve noticed that too. I don’t think we’ll be going anywhere until it calms down."

"You mean we’re stuck in here for another four hours?" Alex asked.

Brett nodded, a little more seriously this time. "That’s what the shift’s for, right?"

As the storm kept up its unyielding pace, the trio fell back into their rounds. Everything was fine, just like it had been last night and the night before. They moved through the corridors, checked the upper levels, the old stores, the food court. They even went through the service areas, where the broken-down sections of the mall still lay, untouched for years.

Normalcy in the Absence of Time
Brett, Sean, and Alex didn’t need to talk much anymore. The quiet was so familiar that words felt unnecessary. It wasn’t until Brett paused in front of an old luxury store on the third floor, his flashlight dancing over the old glass displays, that the quiet was broken.

"Anyone ever find out what happened to these places?" Brett asked, shining his light on a few high-end shops that had clearly been left behind.

Sean glanced up, his expression unreadable. "What do you mean?"

"Like, what made them just... shut down? These stores were probably full of stock at some point, and then poof—gone." Brett waved his flashlight vaguely. "It’s weird."

Alex stopped next to him, surveying the empty storefronts. "Who knows. Maybe it just wasn’t worth keeping these things open anymore. Shopping habits changed. Things close. That’s how the world works."

Brett nodded, but the thought stayed with him. Why this mall? Why was it still standing, in this state, when so many others had fallen by the wayside? What was left to keep alive here?

The Night Progresses
By the time the night was nearing its end, Brett’s unease had grown. He couldn’t shake the feeling that there was something about this mall that didn’t sit right. It wasn’t the storm, it wasn’t the old, dilapidated shops, and it certainly wasn’t the fact that it was empty. It was something else—something that he couldn’t place.

The rain was still pouring outside, and the storm wasn’t showing any signs of stopping. It almost felt like the outside world was pushing against the walls of the mall, trying to break in. But the mall, despite its isolation and decay, stood firm.

"Alright, let’s check in," Alex said, her voice breaking through the radio static. "We’ve only got an hour left before the shift ends. Anyone else feel like something’s off tonight?"

There was a brief silence on the radio before Brett replied. "You too, huh? Yeah, I feel it too. But I don’t know... maybe it’s just the storm messing with my head."

"Yeah," Sean chimed in. "I’ll feel better once the shift’s over. Just get through it."

They continued their rounds. Even though nothing had happened yet, the tension that had built up over the last few hours remained. Brett kept glancing at the empty stores, the flickering lights, and the cold, silent halls. It all felt wrong.

End of the Shift
At last, the clock ticked toward 3:00 AM. The storm was still howling outside, but inside the mall, everything was still. The guards checked the cameras, checked the doors, and checked in with each other one last time.

"Alright, same as before," Alex said, her voice tired. "Nothing unusual. See you guys tomorrow night."

"Yeah, goodnight," Brett replied, already heading for the exit.

"See you," Sean said, his tone flat as he checked the last set of monitors.

As they walked out, the mall seemed to settle into its routine once again. The storm outside didn’t seem to lessen, but the guards were gone now, leaving the empty halls to hold onto their secrets for one more day.

This chapter continues the routine of the first shift, with the only change being the mounting unease that comes with the storm outside. There are no overtly spooky occurrences, but there’s a palpable discomfort growing as the night wears on, setting up for later developments.

Let me know if this fits the vibe you’re looking for! Would you like to continue with the second shift or add anything more to the first shift’s progression?





Chapter 6: Night Two - The Storm’s Hold (Continued)
As the night wore on, the storm outside intensified. The gusts of wind rattled the windows, and the sound of the rain pounding against the roof echoed through the corridors of the mall. Inside, the atmosphere remained heavy, the quiet hum of the building only broken by the occasional static crackle of the radio.

Dave, Claire, and Tom moved through the familiar halls, continuing their rounds with mechanical precision. The storm was relentless, and while it had been present the entire evening, it was starting to make its presence known in ways that weren’t entirely expected.

"I swear, it feels like it’s getting worse," Tom muttered as he adjusted the collar of his jacket, his breath misting in the cold air as he moved through the dim corridors.

"It’s just the storm," Claire replied, but her voice was tinged with unease. "It’s fine."

But as they passed by the old fountain in the food court, they all stopped in their tracks. The fountain, which had been dry for as long as anyone could remember, was now leaking water—a slow trickle that ran down the side and pooled in the cracks of the stone basin. It wasn’t flowing, not in the traditional sense, but the steady drip was enough to catch their attention.

"That... wasn’t like that earlier," Dave said, frowning as he took a step closer to inspect the fountain.

Claire squinted, her flashlight casting a narrow beam on the small stream of water. "What the hell? This thing’s been dry for years. How did water suddenly get in here?"

Tom leaned down to get a better look. "You think the storm messed with the plumbing? Maybe the rain got into the system somehow?"

"Could be," Dave said, scratching his chin. "It’s possible. We’ve got those old pipes running through the walls, and with this storm... it could have forced its way in."

"But why now?" Claire asked, her skepticism creeping through. "Why would the water start leaking now? After all this time? And why just here? There’s no other leak that I can see."

"It’s the storm," Dave insisted, though even he sounded unsure. "We’ll check the back later, but for now, let’s not jump to conclusions. Could just be a weird coincidence."

They all stood for a moment, watching the water leak slowly into the fountain’s basin. The sound of the dripping water echoed louder than it should have, the soft plink of each drop hitting the stone floor unnerving in its stillness.

"It’s strange, but I’m not gonna worry about it unless it gets worse," Claire said, turning back to the hallway. "We’ve got other places to check."

They moved on, but the sound of water dripping was now lodged in the back of their minds. It wasn’t a major issue—nothing that needed immediate attention. Still, the fountain’s sudden change from dry to leaky was unsettling, especially considering its history of being unused for years.

A New Routine
The rest of their shift passed quietly, though the strange anomaly of the fountain remained on their minds. It felt... wrong. Not in a supernatural way, but in a way that made the mall seem just a little more off than it already was. The storm continued outside, howling through the night, and the strange drips of water from the fountain were the only sign that anything was different.

It was nearing the end of their shift, and Dave, Claire, and Tom had wrapped up their rounds. The air felt thick, like it was waiting for something to happen, but nothing did. There were no strange noises, no flickering lights, no signs of anything out of the ordinary—only the storm, the dripping fountain, and the heavy silence of the mall.

As they stood in the security room, preparing to check out and pass the baton to the next team, Dave made one final check of the monitors. "Everything’s clear. No unusual activity."

Tom was still staring at the camera feed of the food court, his eyes lingering on the image of the fountain, watching the last few drops of water fall slowly into the basin. It seemed as though the leak had stopped, though the water had already gathered on the stone floor, a small pool now forming.

"I guess it’s done leaking," Tom muttered, half to himself.

"Probably," Claire replied, glancing at the monitor. "It’s just weird, though. Like... how it just started."

"Let’s not think too much about it," Dave said, sounding a little tired. "It’s probably nothing. We’ve got bigger things to worry about."

The trio made their way to the exit. As they left, the sound of the rain outside grew quieter, the storm slowly beginning to lose its intensity. The mall remained as it always was—still, silent, waiting.

End of the Shift
By the time the clock ticked over to 3:00 AM, the shift had ended. Brett, Alex, and Sean arrived, ready to take over. As the three guards exchanged quick greetings, Dave, Claire, and Tom filed out of the security room, their footsteps echoing in the darkened halls.

The storm had quieted, and though the fountain’s strange leak had been addressed, there was a sense of unease that lingered. It wasn’t the storm anymore. It wasn’t the strange sound of water dripping in an empty mall. It was something more.

But for now, everything seemed normal. Just another night, another shift in the empty mall. The strange leak was nothing more than an oddity, a small inconvenience to mark the passage of time.

But as the second shift settled in, the feeling that something wasn’t right hung in the air like the last few raindrops outside. They wouldn’t know it yet, but the calm before the storm would not last long.

This chapter continues to maintain the slow burn of tension without overtly spooky events, but introduces the first subtle anomaly—the fountain leaking water. It’s something that can be logically explained by the storm, but it still leaves the guards and the readers with that feeling of wrongness. The storm itself is a nice backdrop, adding a sense of unease without directly tying it to anything supernatural.

Let me know if this fits the pace you're envisioning for this chapter!







Chapter 7: Night Four – The Arcade Awakens
The storm outside was relentless, still howling with the same fury it had carried for the past few nights. The wind rattled the windows and the rain lashed against the roof, as if the entire world was conspiring against the calm that the guards were trying to maintain inside the mall.

It had been an uneventful start to the night. The first shift had begun at 9:00 PM, and Brett, Alex, and Sean were settling into their roles. The mall felt as dead as it had the previous nights, the silence broken only by the occasional sound of the wind outside.

The fountain had been leaking for three nights now. The slow, steady drip had become a constant presence, like an unwanted companion. There was still no explanation for it. The storm was still raging, and the guards had chalked it up to the plumbing finally giving out. The water had pooled in the basin, but it hadn’t overflowed yet.

"Same as yesterday?" Alex asked as she entered the security room, her voice cutting through the stillness. She dropped her bag onto the counter, trying to shake off the weight of the storm.

"Yeah, nothing’s changed," Brett replied. He checked the monitors, his eyes scanning the same familiar corridors. "Still got the fountain leaking, but it's not like it’s anything new."

"I swear," Alex said, pausing at the door to the security room. "The sound of that water dripping... It’s getting to me."

Sean, who had been sitting silently, stared at the monitors. He didn’t respond at first. His eyes were locked on the camera feed for the arcade on the second floor. The mall’s arcade had been shut down for years, the machines abandoned and unused. But tonight, something was different.

One of the arcade machines on the screen had turned on.

The sudden sound of a screen blaring to life in the otherwise silent mall startled him. The machine, a classic racing game, hummed as it powered up, the screen flashing with bright, garish colors. The familiar sound of its starting tune rang out through the security room, loud and intrusive.

"What the hell?" Sean muttered under his breath.

"What’s wrong?" Brett asked, glancing over at him. "Everything alright?"

"Look at this," Sean said, his voice low as he pointed at the camera feed.

On the second-floor camera, the arcade machine was fully illuminated, the screen flickering with a bright, electric blue glow. The noise from the machine echoed down the empty halls, jarring against the otherwise lifeless mall.

"How is that possible?" Alex asked, her voice tinged with unease. "The power’s supposed to be off in that section. I checked earlier. There’s no way the machine could be on."

"I’ll check it out," Brett said, his tone more serious now. He grabbed his flashlight and moved toward the door.

"Wait," Sean said quickly, stopping him. "It could be malfunctioning. But something about it doesn’t sit right. You’re sure everything’s off in there, right?"

"I’m sure," Alex replied, already moving toward the stairs. "I checked the power grid earlier today. The arcade hasn’t been running in years. There’s no reason it should just turn on by itself."

The three of them exchanged uneasy glances.

"Alright, let’s just take it slow. It’s probably nothing," Brett said, his words trailing off as he opened the door to head for the second floor. "We’ll check it out and shut it down."

The Arcade on the Second Floor
The walk to the second floor was almost unnervingly quiet. The storm still raged outside, but inside the mall, everything was oddly still. The faint hum of the arcade machines echoed through the darkened hallways, a jarring sound that felt out of place in the otherwise silent mall.

When they reached the arcade, Brett’s flashlight illuminated the rows of machines that had been gathering dust for years. The rows of dead, unused consoles stood like relics of a forgotten time. The air smelled stale, the faint scent of mildew and old carpeting mixing with the underlying scent of disuse.

At the far end of the arcade, the bright blue glow from the racing game machine stood out like a beacon in the dark. The sound of the game’s intro music blared through the still air, louder than it had any right to be in this place.

"This is messed up," Claire said, a note of disbelief in her voice. She stepped closer, staring at the screen. "What the hell happened to the power in this area? It should’ve been off."

Brett moved cautiously toward the machine. He shone his flashlight on the racing game’s control panel. The buttons were all lit up, and the screen flashed with the familiar "Press Start" prompt.

"This shouldn’t be happening," Brett muttered. He leaned down and unplugged the machine, watching as the screen blinked off.

For a moment, everything was silent again. The arcade machine had powered down, the screen going dark, and the loud music that had filled the air was gone.

But as they turned to leave, the sound of the game’s music suddenly blared back to life.

This time, it was louder.

"What the hell?" Tom hissed under his breath.

"Let’s get out of here," Sean said, his voice tight. "Something’s off. This is not normal."

Brett’s eyes flicked to the power cables. He was sure he’d unplugged the machine properly. But it was back on.

"This is just a freak accident. Nothing else," Brett said, though his voice didn’t sound as sure as before. "Let’s get back to the security room and check the cameras again."

They turned and left the arcade, but the feeling that something wasn’t right clung to them like a shadow.

The Strange Return
Back in the security room, the cameras flickered on the screen again. The arcade machine was now on again, as if it had never been turned off.

"Alright, that’s it," Brett said, shaking his head. "We’re getting someone down here to look at the power. This is beyond us."

Claire looked at the monitors, her face pale. "It’s still running. But why?"

"Why is it even running in the first place?" Sean added, his voice tight. "Something doesn’t make sense about this."

For the rest of the night, the arcade machine remained on, seemingly of its own accord, lighting up the dark hall with its loud, colorful glow. The rain and storm outside had died down, but the unsettling feeling inside the mall only grew stronger with each passing hour.

End of the Shift
The clock struck 9:00 AM, signaling the end of their shift. Dave, Claire, and Tom arrived, looking bleary-eyed and tired from their long hours.

As the new team settled in, the arcade machine was still on.

"Did you guys mess with the machines down there?" Dave asked, looking at Brett, Claire, and Sean.

"No," Claire said, her voice hesitant. "But one of the machines is... on."

"The power’s all off in that area," Tom replied, raising an eyebrow. "Something’s definitely wrong here."

And as the new team took over, the arcade machine continued to flicker with life. The storm had passed, but the strange, persistent hum of the machine seemed to linger, drawing attention.

This chapter ends with the first significant, unsettling event—a familiar arcade machine suddenly coming to life in the dead of night, even though there’s no logical explanation for it. The mall is still filled with that sense of discomfort, and the security guards are left grappling with the mystery of why this is happening. For now, the hollow isn’t fully revealed, but the creeping sense of wrongness is only growing.

How does this feel? Does it keep the slow-burn tension you were hoping for, or would you like to adjust anything?







Chapter 8: Night Four – The Arcade’s Call
The storm outside had not let up. The wind howled through the mall’s empty parking lot, rattling the windows like a constant reminder that the world beyond the walls of the mall was still very much alive, chaotic, and unpredictable. But inside, the mall remained still, like a tomb—the only sounds being the hum of the air conditioning and the distant, relentless drip-drip of water from the fountain.

The strange, inexplicable leak continued. Every hour, another drop of water hit the basin, building slowly, quietly, as if it had all the time in the world. There was no explanation for it, no reason it should be happening. The storm had done its damage, but the fountain's leak... it seemed to defy reason.

Tonight, the air felt thicker, the atmosphere more oppressive. As the first shift started, Brett, Alex, and Sean were already in the security room, ready to begin their rounds. The usual conversations were muted by the weight of the weather outside, the heavy rumblings of thunder barely audible through the thick walls of the mall.

"Same as yesterday?" Alex asked, flicking the power switch for the first set of monitors.

"Yeah," Sean replied, his voice low, almost distracted as he checked the camera feeds. "Quiet. Too quiet."

"Feels like the storm’s doing its own thing tonight," Brett added, turning toward the security room door, as if trying to shake off the eerie quiet that had settled in with the storm.

The trio moved to their positions, splitting up to take their rounds. As always, the mall was vast, empty, and silent. The faint hum of the mall’s electricity, the occasional flicker of the lights, and the endless sound of rain outside were the only things filling the emptiness.

The Arcade Awakens
Alex was making her way down the second floor corridor when she first heard it.

A loud, jarring noise broke through the silence—a sound so distinct, so out of place, that it stopped her in her tracks. At first, it was almost imperceptible, like the hum of an old speaker struggling to come to life. But it quickly grew louder, until it was unmistakable: the sharp, blaring sound of an arcade game booting up.

"Is that..." Alex muttered to herself, staring down the long, dim corridor. Her heart skipped a beat as she realized what she was hearing. The sound was coming from the arcade.

Alex's hand hovered over her radio, but before she could even speak, she heard Sean’s voice crackle through.

"Did... did you hear that?" Sean’s voice was almost frantic, his tone tight.

"Yeah, I hear it," Alex responded, her pulse quickening. "What the hell is going on with that arcade machine?"

"Wait..." Sean’s voice faltered. "I can see it on the feed. The racing machine is—it’s on."

Alex glanced over her shoulder toward the security room. She had passed the arcade on her rounds earlier, and it had been dark—no sign of life. But now, the screen of one of the machines blared to life, glowing with bright, flashing colors that seemed to vibrate with noise. The machine was clearly running—its high-pitched, distorted music blaring through the speakers.

It was impossible. The arcade had been shut down for years.

Alex’s heart raced as she quickened her steps, moving back toward the arcade. Something didn’t sit right about this. She could feel it in her bones.

A Terrifying Discovery
Sean was still glued to the monitors, his eyes wide, barely blinking as he watched the feed. The arcade machine was still on, flashing with vibrant neon colors, the sound of the music so loud it seemed to echo through the entire building. But it wasn’t just the sound that unsettled him—it was the way the game displayed itself on the screen.

The graphics were... wrong. They were distorted, glitchy, almost like they were breaking apart, flickering with strange static and unnatural colors. The racing car on the screen was pixelated, but it wasn’t just the graphics that bothered him. It was the feeling that something was watching him through the screen.

Sean’s fingers hovered over the controls as he leaned in closer, his breath catching in his throat. There, on the screen, the figure of a car, distorted and alien, seemed to stare right back at him.

But it wasn’t just the game. Something else was there. Something he couldn’t explain. The more he stared, the more the screen seemed to shift, warping and distorting in real time.

The sound, loud and grating, cut through his thoughts, like an alarm ringing inside his head. He quickly reached for the radio, his voice shaking.

"Alex, something’s wrong. I don’t know what’s going on, but this—this isn’t normal. I can’t explain it."

Alex arrived just in time to hear the last part of Sean’s transmission. She stepped into the arcade area, her flashlight cutting through the darkness. The arcade machine was just as Sean had said—blaring loudly, flickering unnaturally. The screen seemed to twist with colors that didn’t belong.

"What the hell is this?" Alex whispered, moving closer to the machine.

Sean stood frozen in place, his eyes still locked on the feed. He couldn’t look away, but his heart was pounding in his chest.

"It's... it's not supposed to be like this," he muttered, shaking his head. "Something’s wrong."

"Sean, you alright?" Alex asked, her voice quieter now, more concerned.

But Sean didn’t answer. Instead, he stepped back from the monitors, his face pale, his movements slow and deliberate. He reached for his radio but stopped halfway. His hand trembled. His mind raced with thoughts he couldn’t make sense of.

"I... I can’t do this," he said, his voice barely above a whisper. "I can’t stay here. This isn’t right."

Before Alex could respond, Sean turned abruptly, his footsteps echoing loudly in the still air as he made his way for the exit.

"Sean, wait!" Alex called, but it was too late. Sean was already out of the room, headed toward the doors of the mall.

The Exit
Alex and Brett were left standing in the arcade, the sound of the arcade machine’s blaring music still cutting through the air like a knife. The storm outside, now softer but still persistent, howled against the windows, but inside the mall, everything was oddly still—except for the machine.

Alex turned back toward Brett, her eyes wide. "He’s... he’s gone. He just quit."

Brett’s face twisted in confusion. "What? No. He wouldn’t—"

"He did," Alex said, her voice thick with disbelief. "He’s gone. Just left. He... he saw something, I don’t know what, but he’s gone."

The arcade machine continued to blare, the noise seeming to fill the entire mall, bouncing off the walls and amplifying the unease in the air.

End of the Shift
The rest of the shift passed uneventfully. The arcade machine remained on, as though it had a life of its own, though neither Alex nor Brett dared go back to check on it. They knew they couldn’t leave it like that, but the fear that Sean had shown was too real to ignore.

By the time 3:00 AM rolled around, Brett and Alex were tired, unsettled, and just waiting for the end of the shift. The storm still raged outside, but inside the mall, it was quieter now. The arcade machine, however, continued to blare its garish, unnatural music, as if it were trying to fill the silence.

The clock ticked toward the end of the shift, and though nothing more unusual happened, the strange sense of wrongness had taken root. Sean was gone, and the arcade machine was still on.

It was just a little past 3:00 AM when Claire, Tom, and Dave arrived to take over the next shift. Alex gave them the rundown, her voice heavy with the weight of what had happened.

"Sean’s gone," she said, shaking her head. "He quit. He just... left. Said it was too much."

The others were silent, taking in the news.

"Did something happen?" Tom asked, looking toward the second floor.

"We don’t know," Brett said quietly. "But... the arcade machine’s been on all night."

For a moment, no one said anything.

Then, Claire spoke, her voice calm but strained. "Let’s check it out. And if there’s anything weird going on, we’re reporting it."

As the new shift settled in, the arcade machine’s glow filled the dark hall, its bright, distorted screen still blaring through the empty mall. And as the hours ticked on, the storm outside began to subside—but the unease that had settled over the mall was only just beginning to grow.








Chapter 9: The Calm After the Storm
The storm outside had not let up. In fact, it seemed to have gotten worse as the night stretched on, the rain coming down in heavy sheets, relentless and unforgiving. The wind howled through the empty parking lot, its fury echoing off the walls of the mall. But inside, the building stood firm—its quiet, dark corridors silent except for the faint hum of the old fluorescent lights.

The security room felt unnervingly still when Claire, Tom, and Dave arrived for the second shift. There was an odd, oppressive feeling in the air, though none of them could quite put their finger on why. It was as if the storm outside had seeped into the very bones of the building, making everything feel heavier, colder.

“Alright, same deal as always,” Claire said, her voice breaking the silence. “Let’s do a quick check of the cameras and then hit our rounds. We’ll split up like last time.”

Tom glanced at the monitors, his eyes immediately falling on the feed for the arcade. "Should we check on that arcade machine?" he asked, though his tone was almost casual.

"We’re checking all areas, Tom," Claire replied, though she didn’t look at him. "But yeah, we’ll take a look."

Dave, who had been silently adjusting his radio, looked up. “So, is it true? Sean actually just left?”

"Yeah," Alex replied, her voice quiet but with an edge of disbelief. "He just walked off the job. Left in the middle of the shift."

Claire exchanged a look with Tom. “That’s... unsettling. But we’ll focus on our rounds tonight. No reason to dwell on it.”

Tom checked the camera feed again, the familiar layout of the arcade appearing on screen. But when he looked at it, the arcade was just as silent and dark as it had been for years. The flickering neon sign outside the arcade was dark, the space entirely still. There was no sign of the machine that had been blaring earlier.

"That’s strange," Tom said, frowning as he leaned in closer to the screen. "It’s off. It wasn’t off before."

Claire walked over to the screen, her eyes scanning the camera feed. "You sure it was on? Maybe just a glitch?"

Tom nodded, glancing over his shoulder toward the arcade. "I swear I saw it. The thing was blaring music. Something’s... wrong here."

"We’ll check it out when we get down there," Dave said. "For now, let’s focus on making our rounds and checking the building."

The group moved into the hallways, their footsteps echoing in the stillness of the mall. The storm outside continued to rage, a steady roar that seemed to amplify the quiet of the building. The overhead lights flickered occasionally, but the silence that lingered inside the mall was far more unsettling.

The Fountain’s Drip
As they made their way to the food court, Claire and Tom passed by the fountain, now a prominent feature of the hall. The slow drip of water had continued, and there was a noticeable difference tonight. The basin, once completely dry, had accumulated a few inches of water. The drops echoed in the silence, like an insistent reminder that something was slowly changing, though no one could say exactly why.

Claire paused, staring at the fountain. "Still leaking?" she asked.

"Yeah," Tom replied, his voice low. "It’s been dripping all night. Strange, isn’t it? It was bone dry yesterday."

"Doesn’t make any sense," Claire muttered. "How does water just... start leaking like that?"

"I don’t know," Tom said. "But it’s not like we can fix it, right? Let’s keep moving. We can’t waste time on things like this."

They moved on, passing by the rows of empty stores. Everything seemed unchanged, but there was something unsettling about the emptiness tonight. The storm outside felt like it had taken on a life of its own, and the mall, once just a quiet, empty space, now felt as if it was holding its breath, waiting for something to happen.

The Patrol Continues
They continued their rounds in silence. No one spoke much, each lost in their thoughts as they walked through the dark corridors, their flashlight beams cutting through the stillness. Tom was still uneasy, his mind focused on the arcade. He couldn’t shake the feeling that something had changed. That something wasn’t right.

As they made their way to the second floor, Tom felt a growing sense of dread that he couldn’t quite explain. The arcade was still dark, the machines silent, but the feeling of unease lingered.

Claire checked the monitors again as they approached the area, her eyes scanning the feed for any signs of movement. "Everything looks fine," she said, though her voice sounded uncertain.

They passed the arcade without incident, but the silence in the air was now almost palpable, as though the mall itself was holding its breath. It was clear that the storm wasn’t the only thing unsettled tonight.

The Unseen Shift
The rest of the patrol went by without incident. The mall was eerily quiet, the sound of rain on the windows almost deafening as they moved through the dark hallways. The fountain had continued its slow drip, the basin now filled with more water, but still nothing that seemed to warrant immediate concern.

By the time their rounds were nearly done, Claire, Tom, and Dave had passed through the majority of the mall. Everything seemed ordinary on the surface, but the tension in the air had only grown.

As they made their way back to the security room, Claire cast a glance at the clock. The shift was almost over.

"Alright," she said, her voice tired but steady. "Let’s wrap this up. It’s almost time for the handoff."

The trio made their way back to the security room, their radios crackling softly with static. The storm had begun to subside, but the odd sense of unease remained.

The fountain continued to drip.

End of the Shift
At 3:00 AM, their shift came to a close. They filed out of the security room and passed the baton to the incoming team.

"Everything good?" Dave asked, raising an eyebrow as he stepped in.

"Quiet," Claire said, though her voice carried a subtle edge of concern. "Just check on the arcade. And the fountain’s still leaking."

"Yeah, we’ll take care of it," Dave replied, his voice calm as he settled into his seat at the security desk.

As the new team took over, the three of them glanced at the fountain one last time. The water had continued to rise in the basin, and the slow drip still echoed in the quiet of the food court.

But there were no more surprises tonight.

This chapter keeps the eerie, slow-building atmosphere intact, with the arcade machine still lingering in the background as a mystery, and the fountain continuing its unsettling drip. The guards notice the strange water leak but don’t connect it to anything yet—keeping the tension at a low simmer for now. This chapter allows us to slowly build the sense of unease while still maintaining the quiet, routine nature of the night shifts.

Let me know if you want to tweak anything!

Chapter 10: Night Five – Shifting Gears
The storm had finally relented, leaving only the remnants of its fury behind. The rain was still, a soft patter against the mall’s windows, and the wind no longer howled with the same violence. The air felt heavier now, as though the storm’s passing had brought with it a stillness that lingered in the corners of the mall.

The hum of the fluorescent lights was the only constant, alongside the slow, rhythmic drip-drip-drip of the fountain in the food court.

It was the fifth night since the unsettling events had begun, and for Claire, Tom, and Dave, the absence of Sean was starting to settle in. The three of them, with only five guards left, had to make do. As a result, they’d begun taking double shifts, alternating between patrolling the mall and manning the security room.

Tonight, it was Claire who would step into Sean’s position. There was a certain unease hanging in the air, but they all knew it was something they had to adjust to. After all, they had to keep the mall secure, even if that meant pushing through whatever unsettling feelings had been mounting.

A Quiet Start
The night started off like any other—uneventful. Claire, Tom, and Dave took their positions, moving through the empty mall with the usual quiet efficiency. The sounds of the night—the hum of the HVAC system, the distant echo of footsteps—were familiar, almost comforting, in their predictability.

"I swear, every night the place feels just a little bit... off," Claire muttered to herself as she made her way down the second-floor corridor. Her flashlight flickered across the walls, casting long shadows.

"Yeah, I know what you mean," Tom replied over the radio, his voice crackling slightly. "But what can we do about it? We’re here to do a job. We stick to the schedule, check the cameras, and keep the place locked up tight."

"I get it, I just..." Claire trailed off, glancing around. "It’s always so quiet."

Tom chuckled. "That's the job, Claire. Quiet is good."

But quiet was starting to feel unnatural to Claire. The absence of Sean was palpable. His sudden departure had left a gap in the team’s dynamic that, while manageable, still hung in the air. Sean had always been the first to crack a joke or lighten the mood, but now, that energy was missing.

And then there was the fountain.

The Fountain’s Drip
Claire paused as she walked past the food court. The fountain, which had been leaking for days now, was still dripping steadily. She stopped to observe it for a moment, her eyes narrowing as she studied the basin. There was no sign of change—the water had risen only slightly, still far from overflowing, but it felt... off. There was something unsettling about it, something that tugged at the back of her mind.

The sound of the water was almost too loud in the empty food court, a constant reminder that something in the mall was quietly, insistently shifting.

She keyed her radio. "Hey, guys. The fountain’s still leaking. The water’s... rising a bit. It hasn’t overflowed yet, but it’s definitely higher than before."

"Noted," Dave responded, his voice neutral. "Keep an eye on it. If it starts to overflow, let us know. For now, just keep moving."

Claire nodded to herself, the weight of the silence pressing down on her. She moved on, checking the rest of her assigned route. The fountain would have to wait. But for some reason, the noise of the water continued to linger in her thoughts, as if it was the one thing in this place that wasn’t still.

The Arcade Machine – A New Concern
By the time Claire arrived at the arcade, a new sense of unease had settled over her. There was something about this place, this mall, that made her feel like it was holding its breath, waiting for something to happen. She walked through the dark arcade, her flashlight bouncing off the rows of old machines. They looked almost... alive, with their faded, flickering screens and broken buttons.

It was then that her flashlight caught the familiar outline of the racing machine. The one that had blared to life on Sean’s last shift.

It was silent now, as it should be. But the memory of the screen, flashing with strange colors and eerie static, was still fresh in Claire’s mind.

Her hand hovered over the radio again. "Tom, any signs of life in the arcade? Everything seems... fine here, but I don’t like how quiet it is."

"Yeah, same here," Tom replied, his voice almost too calm. "We’ll keep an eye on it."

Claire continued her rounds, her unease growing with every step. The arcade wasn’t the only thing that seemed off. The mall, in its empty, quiet state, felt like it was slowly becoming... something else. The storm had passed, but the weirdness lingered.

Shifting Dynamics
Back in the security room, Dave and Tom were watching the cameras, checking the feeds as they settled into their part of the shift. The fountain continued its steady drip on the screen, and the arcade remained quiet.

"I still don’t get it," Tom muttered, his eyes glued to the camera feed. "Why was that arcade machine on in the first place? The power’s supposed to be off in that section."

Dave shrugged, his eyes not leaving the monitors. "I don’t know, man. But I think we’re overthinking it. It’s just an old, malfunctioning machine. Happens all the time."

"Maybe. But there’s something about it that doesn’t feel right. It’s not just a glitch. It’s like... it’s trying to be seen."

Dave turned toward Tom, a skeptical expression on his face. "Now you’re just being paranoid."

"I’m just saying," Tom insisted. "Something’s off about it."

Before Dave could respond, Claire’s voice came through the radio again.

"I’m heading toward the third floor," she said. "Let’s just finish up this shift."

The End of the Shift
As the hours passed, the storm outside faded into the distance, but the strange unease inside the mall never dissipated. The slow drip of the fountain continued, the arcade was quiet, and everything seemed... still. Yet, it felt like the calm before something inevitable.

By the time 3:00 AM rolled around, Claire’s shift had ended. She was relieved—tired from the long shift and unsettled by the small, persistent unease that had clung to her all night. She left the security room to meet Tom and Dave, who were ready to take over for the second shift.

"You good?" Tom asked, his voice unusually soft.

"Yeah," Claire replied, though she didn’t sound entirely convinced. "Just... ready to be done. This place is getting to me."

Dave raised an eyebrow. "You sure? You don’t usually get spooked by shifts like this."

"Yeah, well," Claire shrugged, "This one’s different."

As they passed the fountain one last time before clocking out, Claire couldn't help but glance down at the basin. The water was still slowly rising, its soft drip echoing through the empty food court.

And somewhere, deep in the back of her mind, the unsettling thought lingered: Was this just the beginning?


Chapter 11: Night Five – The Calm Before
The storm outside had finally passed, but the remnants of its fury lingered. The skies were still clouded over, but the rain had stopped, and the howling winds had softened into a gentle breeze. The world outside the mall was wet, dark, and heavy with moisture. But inside the building, everything was still.

The faint hum of the mall’s lights echoed through the long, empty corridors, and the rhythmic drip-drip of the fountain in the food court remained an ever-present sound. It had been leaking for days now, but tonight, something felt different. The air was thick with anticipation, even if the storm had subsided.

It was Claire, Alex, and Brett’s turn to take the first shift tonight. With only five guards remaining, they’d had to rearrange the schedule to accommodate double shifts. It wasn’t ideal, but it was the only option they had. The three of them met in the security room at the start of the night, the tiredness of the past few days hanging over them.

"Ready for another one?" Claire asked, her voice slightly hoarse from lack of sleep.

"I’m always ready," Brett replied, a little too quickly. "We’ve got this."

Alex, still adjusting to the new routine, leaned back in her chair. "I just want to get through this shift. No weird stuff tonight."

"Let’s hope," Claire said with a quiet laugh. "We’ll take it one round at a time."

The Silent Start
The shift began as it always did—quiet and uneventful. They moved through the mall in silence, each one taking a separate route to patrol. The halls stretched on endlessly, empty except for the occasional flicker of a malfunctioning light.

Brett, walking the first-floor corridors, passed by the food court again. The fountain was still leaking, the steady drip continuing its rhythm as it had for the past few nights. There was something unsettling about the way the sound reverberated through the space. It wasn’t loud, but it wasn’t normal either. The fountain, once dry, was now constantly dripping, and the basin had started to fill with water, inch by inch. It was an odd sight, but nothing that warranted an immediate fix.

Still, the sound seemed to fill the otherwise quiet mall with an uncomfortable presence.

"Everything alright in the food court?" Claire’s voice crackled over the radio, breaking through Brett’s thoughts.

"Yeah, just the fountain again," he replied, glancing back at the slowly filling basin. "Same as before. It’s not overflowing, but it’s still weird."

"Noted," Claire replied. "Keep an eye on it."

The Arcade – A Familiar Threat
The rest of their rounds were largely uneventful. The storm had passed, but the night was still thick with tension, and the mall, though vast and empty, felt like it was holding its breath.

As Brett made his way toward the arcade section, he noticed the familiar flickering lights in the distance. The arcade area was far from the action, tucked away on the second floor. It had been unused for years, the machines left to gather dust, but tonight something felt different about it.

It was the same machine that had blared to life on Sean’s last shift, though this time, the sound wasn’t blaring. The arcade machines sat silently, their old screens blank and lifeless. Brett paused at the entrance to the arcade, his flashlight beam illuminating the rows of forgotten games.

"Just making sure," he muttered to himself, stepping closer to the machines. Everything looked the same, nothing out of place.

He checked the power box, but everything appeared fine. No strange power surges, no flickering lights—nothing to explain the previous anomaly. The arcade remained dark and still, the once-bright colors of the machines now muted in the dim light of the mall.

The Fountain’s Drip Continues
Back on the first floor, Claire and Alex were making their way through the usual route. The same eerie quiet hung in the air, the faint drip of the fountain the only sound that seemed to break the stillness. The water was a few inches deeper in the basin now, and it was beginning to feel like it was more than just a malfunctioning pipe.

"Still leaking," Claire muttered under her breath as she passed the fountain once more. She noticed the same slow drip that had been happening for the past few nights. The water, though harmless for now, was unsettling.

"Yeah, it’s like it’s never going to stop," Alex said, walking beside her. "It’s just water, though, right?"

"Yeah, but it’s too regular," Claire replied. "The storm’s over, but the drip hasn’t slowed down."

They moved past it, but the feeling of unease lingered in Claire’s mind as they continued their rounds. The mall, despite being empty, felt alive with something, even if that something wasn’t immediately identifiable. The leak from the fountain felt like an omen, like a sign of something lurking just beneath the surface.

A Moment of Distraction
Around 2:30 AM, the shift started to take its toll. The tiredness was becoming apparent, but they still had another half hour to go. Claire, Alex, and Brett were doing their final round when Claire felt the sudden urge to stop.

"I swear, I heard something," she said, stopping dead in her tracks. She glanced around, looking for any sign of movement.

Alex and Brett both paused, scanning the shadows in the dim light. "What did you hear?" Alex asked.

"I don’t know. A voice? Something faint. Maybe it’s just the storm messing with me."

The mall was silent, though, save for the occasional hum of the lights. The wind outside had stopped, leaving nothing but the distant sounds of the dripping fountain and their footsteps to fill the air.

Claire shook her head. "It’s nothing. Let’s finish up."

The End of the Shift
The final minutes of the shift dragged on. There was no other sign of anything unusual, no sudden noises or disturbances. The arcade remained still and dark, the fountain’s drip as steady as ever. By the time the clock struck 3:00 AM, Claire, Alex, and Brett were more than ready to hand over the shift.

"You good?" Claire asked, turning to Alex and Brett.

"Yeah," Brett said, looking over the monitors one last time. "Quiet as always."

"Same," Alex added, nodding.

Claire’s eyes lingered on the fountain for a moment longer, and then she glanced over at the arcade. Everything seemed... fine. But there was something about the way the water kept dripping, and the way the arcade machines remained dark, that made her feel uneasy.

The clock ticked on, and the next team—Dave, Tom, and Claire’s replacement—arrived to take over. They gave their final reports and passed the baton.

As Claire walked out of the security room, she couldn’t shake the feeling that something was waiting.






Chapter 11: Night Five – Quiet Stillness
The storm that had been battering the mall for days had finally subsided. The howling winds and pouring rain had ceased, leaving behind a heavy, oppressive stillness. The sky above was dark, filled with thick clouds that blocked any trace of the moon. The only sounds that filled the vast emptiness of the mall were the faint hum of overhead lights and the persistent drip-drip-drip from the fountain in the food court.

The mall was quieter now, but something about the calm felt wrong. Like a long, drawn-out breath, held and waiting to be released.

For the first shift of the night, Claire had stepped into Sean’s place. With only five guards left, they had decided to rotate double shifts, taking turns to ensure the mall remained secure. Alex, Brett, and Claire had taken the first shift—9 PM to 3 AM. It was a quiet routine, but the air felt thick tonight, charged with something they couldn’t quite name.

A Routine, Yet Unsettling Start
The first few hours passed as usual. The mall was still and empty, the usual silence broken only by the occasional flicker of the overhead lights. There was a constant low hum from the heating and cooling systems. Claire, Alex, and Brett moved through their rounds methodically, keeping an eye on the monitors, making sure everything was in place.

The fountain had continued leaking since the storm started, a constant drip-drip of water filling the basin. It wasn’t overflowing, but it was steadily collecting. Claire paused in the food court on her rounds to check it once more, her flashlight cutting through the darkness. The water had risen slightly, but nothing seemed out of place.

"It’s still leaking," Claire muttered to herself, eyeing the fountain as the water continued its relentless drip.

"How long has it been doing this?" Alex asked, catching up behind her.

"Since the storm started," Claire replied. "It’s not dangerous, but it’s still... weird. We’ve been monitoring it every night."

Brett, walking past the two of them, added, "Probably just a busted pipe or something. Nothing to worry about."

"I hope so," Claire said, feeling the uneasy pull of something unspoken. It wasn’t the fountain that unsettled her, though. It was the atmosphere—the air felt heavier tonight, and the sound of the water, while normal, seemed louder than it should be.

They continued their patrol, moving through the empty corridors of the mall. The place was vast, and tonight it felt like they were walking through a maze of shadows. The familiar shops, long abandoned, looked like ghostly silhouettes in the dark. The only source of light was the dim glow from the security room’s monitors, which they checked in passing.

Everything seemed fine. Too fine.

The Arcade
By the time they reached the arcade, a sense of unease had crept over them all. The arcade was isolated in a corner of the mall, a forgotten relic of the past. Its machines had been long abandoned, collecting dust in the corner of the building. But tonight, there was something that made the place feel different.

The arcade was as quiet as the rest of the mall—silent, save for the soft buzzing of the dim overhead lights. They paused for a moment, looking at the security cameras.

"Nothing seems out of the ordinary," Brett muttered, watching the cameras carefully. The arcade appeared as it always had—empty, dark, and still.

"Let’s just keep moving," Claire said, though she couldn’t shake the feeling that something wasn’t right. There was an unsettling familiarity in the silence of this place, as though it were waiting for something to happen.

The Drip Continues
As they made their way through the second floor, Claire couldn’t help but feel like something was off. The fountain’s constant drip was the only sound in the otherwise quiet mall, and it seemed to be echoing louder as they walked further away from the food court.

The fountain was still leaking—still dripping—but now, the basin was nearly half full. The water pooled slowly, the steady drip marking each passing moment. It wasn’t an urgent situation, but the sound felt strangely loud in the stillness.

Alex looked over at Claire. "It’s still going?"

"Yeah," Claire said, her voice low. "But it’s not dangerous. It’s just... unsettling."

Brett was already ahead, walking through the rows of closed stores. The hum of the air conditioning systems, the flickering of distant lights, and the sound of the slow drip followed them as they moved deeper into the mall.

A Silent Patrol
The rest of the shift passed uneventfully. Claire, Alex, and Brett checked the rest of the mall, walking through the empty stores, making sure everything was locked up tight. The mall’s eerie silence never broke, and the storm outside had finally subsided entirely, leaving the world beyond still and calm.

But that same sense of unease lingered. The fountain’s drip had become a constant presence, filling the quiet with its rhythmic sound. It felt like the water was rising, slowly filling the basin, as though it were waiting for something.

The End of the Shift
By the time the clock struck 3:00 AM, the first shift was over. Claire, Alex, and Brett headed back to the security room to hand off the shift to Dave, Tom, and Claire’s replacement.

They exchanged their usual briefings, but the mood was different tonight. Something in the air felt heavier. The calm had become oppressive, as if the mall itself were waiting, watching, for something to happen.

"I swear," Claire said, looking back at the fountain one last time before heading out, "this place is getting to me."

"Yeah," Alex added. "Same here. But we’ve got to stay focused. It’s just another night."

As they passed the security desk to clock out, Brett checked the monitors one last time. The cameras showed the fountain still leaking, the water almost half full, still dripping.

And the arcade, still silent and empty, was just as it should be.







Chapter 12: Night Five – The Shadow in the Dark
The transition from the first shift to the second felt almost seamless. Claire, Alex, and Brett left the security room, their bodies heavy from the long hours, but the atmosphere remained the same—uneasy, quiet, and still. The fountain’s drip continued to echo in the distance, like a constant reminder of something that couldn’t be fixed.

Dave, Tom, and Brett settled into the security room, the familiar hum of the monitors greeting them. The storm had finally passed, and the mall felt strangely still. The only noise was the occasional flicker of a light and the soft dripping of water.

"Alright, same deal as always," Dave said, looking at Tom and Brett. "We’ll do our rounds, check the usual spots. Nothing out of the ordinary, right?"

"Yeah, just keep an eye on the fountain," Tom muttered, his voice tight. The fountain had been leaking all night, and while it wasn’t dangerous, the constant drip had started to weigh on him.

Brett stretched and glanced at the monitors. "Same old. Let’s just get through this shift."

A Quiet Start
The first hour of their shift passed quietly, as expected. They checked the usual spots—the security footage, the entrances, the food court, and the arcade. Everything appeared normal. There was nothing out of place, and the mall felt strangely peaceful, like it was holding its breath.

Tom walked the second-floor corridors, his footsteps echoing in the empty space. He glanced at the monitors every few moments, half-paying attention as his mind wandered. It was just another night—nothing out of the ordinary. Or so it seemed.

The fountain's steady drip was a constant in the background, like a clock ticking slowly in the background of their lives.

The Shadow
As Tom moved further into the second floor, something caught the corner of his eye. At first, he thought it was just a trick of the light, but as he turned his head, his heart skipped a beat. There, just beyond the hallway, he could see a figure standing in the shadows—someone who looked just like Alex.

Tom froze. The figure was dark, barely illuminated by the dim lights overhead. But it was there. Standing, motionless, just like Alex, except this person wasn’t moving.

"Alex?" Tom whispered under his breath, his heart pounding in his chest. He instinctively reached for his flashlight, his fingers shaking as he flicked it on.

The light cut through the dark hall, illuminating the space in a wide beam. But when the light landed on the figure, there was nothing there.

The hallway was empty.

Tom stood there, frozen for a moment, his pulse racing. He swept the flashlight back and forth, searching the shadows. There was no sign of Alex, no sign of anyone at all.

He reached for his radio, his voice strained. "Dave, Brett, did you guys see anyone else on the second floor?"

"Not that I know of," Brett replied, his voice crackling through the radio. "What’s going on, Tom?"

Tom’s breath caught in his throat. He swallowed hard, trying to steady himself. "I... I saw something. It looked like Alex. But when I shined my light on it, it was just gone. I don’t know what the hell happened."

A beat of silence passed over the radio.

"You alright?" Dave’s voice was calm but concerned.

"I’m fine," Tom said, his voice shaky. "I just... it was too real, you know? It looked like Alex standing there, but when I looked back, it was gone. I swear it wasn’t a trick of the light."

"Maybe you’re just tired, man," Brett offered. "You know it gets to you after a while. I’ve seen things out here too."

"I don’t know," Tom muttered. He still couldn’t shake the feeling of dread that had washed over him. He had to get to the bottom of it. But as he continued down the hallway, the strange sense of unease clung to him like a second skin.

The Decision
The rest of the shift was a blur for Tom. The once familiar halls of the mall now seemed different, like they were watching him, waiting for him to slip up. His steps felt heavier, more deliberate. He kept his flashlight on, always looking over his shoulder.

The fountain’s slow, constant drip was still there, adding to the eerie atmosphere, but Tom couldn’t focus on it. His mind kept replaying what he had seen. The figure. The way it had looked like Alex. The way it had disappeared when the light hit it.

As the shift wore on, Tom found himself unable to focus. His movements were slow, his mind clouded. Something in the back of his mind was telling him that he wasn’t just imagining things, that what he had seen was real. But another part of him—the more rational part—kept pushing it away, trying to convince him it was just the exhaustion, just his mind playing tricks on him.

By the time the clock struck 2:45 AM, Tom couldn’t take it anymore.

"Dave, Brett," he said, his voice low but tense. "I’m done. I’m leaving."

"What? Tom, are you sure?" Dave asked, his voice caught between concern and confusion. "It’s almost over."

"I can’t," Tom said, his breath shallow. "I saw something. I can’t keep doing this. I’m done."

There was a pause before Brett spoke up. "Tom, wait—what do you mean you saw something? You’re not thinking straight."

"I don’t care," Tom said, cutting him off. "I’m not staying here. I don’t care what you guys think. I’m out."

Before either of them could respond, Tom was already heading toward the exit, his mind racing with fear and confusion. He didn’t stop to explain any further. His feet moved faster than his thoughts, and soon he was out of the security room and heading for the doors of the mall.

The Aftermath
The second shift began at 3:00 AM, and as Dave and Brett took their positions, there was a palpable tension in the air. Tom was gone. He had quit. And the uncertainty he left behind lingered like a cloud.

Claire, Alex, and Brett were now down to just four. With no sign of Sean and Tom gone, the team was becoming more fractured with each passing night.

As the night wore on, the quiet, creeping feeling in the mall seemed to grow stronger. The fountain continued its steady drip, and the air inside the mall felt colder than before. The arcade remained silent.

But something was changing, and it was clear now that Tom wasn’t the only one who would feel its weight.


Chapter 12: Night Five – The Shadow in the Dark (Revised)
The transition from the first shift to the second felt almost seamless. Claire, Alex, and Brett left the security room, their bodies heavy from the long hours, but the atmosphere remained the same—uneasy, quiet, and still. The fountain’s drip continued to echo in the distance, like a constant reminder of something that couldn’t be fixed.

Dave, Tom, and Brett took over for the second shift, the familiar hum of the monitors greeting them as they settled into their chairs. The mall, though vast and empty, felt oddly suffocating tonight, its silence broken only by the distant sound of the fountain and the occasional flicker of the lights.

The Unease of the Night
The first hour of the shift was uneventful. The trio moved through the mall, keeping their usual pace. Brett checked the monitors while Dave and Tom walked the corridors, occasionally exchanging quiet words. The mall was eerily quiet, the stillness only disturbed by the slow drip of water from the fountain.

Tom couldn’t shake the feeling of unease that seemed to settle deeper with each passing moment. As they walked, his mind kept replaying the events of earlier.

The figure. The shadow that looked like Alex. He couldn’t stop seeing it in his mind. The way it stood motionless in the hallway, the eerie stillness of it. When he shined the flashlight on it, it was gone, leaving him with nothing but the unnerving sensation of being watched.

"Dave," Tom muttered, his voice low. "I swear, I saw something. A shadow. It looked like Alex."

Dave raised an eyebrow but didn’t stop walking. "You sure you’re not just tired, man? It’s easy to see things when you’re running on fumes."

Tom didn’t answer. He wasn’t sure if he had imagined it or if it had been real. But the feeling, the dread, it still lingered.

The Figure
As the shift progressed, Tom couldn’t shake the thought of the shadow. He didn’t want to speak to Alex about it, but the thought of her face, standing motionless in the dark, was all-consuming.

But when it happened again—when he saw it a second time, in another hallway, just outside the arcade—he couldn’t ignore it any longer.

The shadow stood at the end of the hall, its shape unmistakably familiar, its silhouette resembling Alex. It didn’t move. Tom froze, his flashlight shaking in his hand. He shined the light directly at the figure, but once again, when the beam hit, it vanished, slipping into the darkness like a wisp.

"Alex?" Tom whispered, his voice trembling, but there was no answer. No movement. No sign of anyone.

His breath quickened, and he could feel his heart pounding in his chest. The dread grew, the tension becoming unbearable.

By the time he checked the radio to speak to Dave, he felt as if he couldn’t breathe.

"Dave, I can’t do this. I saw it again. It was Alex, standing there. It wasn’t real."

Dave, on the other end of the radio, sounded concerned but calm. "What do you mean it wasn’t real? You’re seeing things, man. I told you, it’s just the hours."

But Tom didn’t care. He felt the fear creeping in, that gnawing sense that he couldn’t explain it away.

“I’m done,” Tom finally said, his voice shaking with the weight of his decision. “I’m not staying here. I’m out.”

There was silence on the radio for a moment before Dave responded. "Tom, wait. What are you talking about? It’s almost over."

"I can’t. I’m not coming back," Tom said, his decision final. "I can’t stay here anymore."

The Departure
Without waiting for a response, Tom grabbed his jacket, slung it over his shoulder, and left the security room, making his way to the exit. His mind was in a blur, his heart pounding in his chest. He couldn’t shake the image of the shadowy figure—the one that had looked so much like Alex.

The Fallout
When Tom left, there was a long, uncomfortable silence in the security room. Dave and Brett exchanged confused glances. What had just happened?

"Do you think he was just... overreacting?" Brett asked, glancing at the door through which Tom had just left.

"I don’t know," Dave replied slowly. "But whatever he saw, it freaked him out. He’s gone, though. We need to focus on the rest of the shift."

But the unease lingered. It wasn’t just the sight of the figure that made Tom leave—it was the way it felt, the way the mall seemed to hold its breath every time they passed through a hallway.

Telling Alex
By the time Claire, Alex, and Brett had completed their shift and came in to take over, the mood was heavy. The usual chatter was replaced with a strange silence. Tom’s departure still hung in the air, the tension thickening with every passing moment.

Brett hesitated, unsure of how to explain what had happened. But when Alex walked into the room, he couldn’t hold it in anymore.

"Alex," he started, his voice low. "Tom... he left. He quit. He said he saw something. A shadow figure. He said it looked like you."

Alex froze, her eyes widening. "What? What do you mean it looked like me?"

"It was a shadow, he said," Brett explained. "It looked just like you, standing in the hallway. He shined the light on it, and it was gone. He left right after that."

Alex felt a cold shiver run down her spine. "I don’t understand. What’s going on in this place?"

Dave spoke up, trying to calm the situation. "It’s just a glitch in his head, Alex. He’s tired, and his mind’s playing tricks on him."

But Alex couldn’t shake the feeling that something wasn’t right. The mall felt different tonight—heavier.

The Drip
Meanwhile, the fountain’s drip continued to echo through the empty mall, its sound loud in the silence of the security room. The water in the basin had risen again, almost reaching the edge. The slow, rhythmic sound of the drip was the only thing that filled the space—persistent, unnerving, and unrelenting.






Chapter 13: Night Six – Quiet Dread
The mall was still, almost too still. The storm had passed, and with it, the unease in the air seemed to settle. But there was something about the silence that made it feel even heavier. The faint drip of the fountain was still there, but tonight, it seemed almost insignificant in the face of the growing tension. The shifts were taking their toll on everyone, and the absence of Tom only added to the odd atmosphere.

Alex walked into the security room, her eyes scanning the space as she took her usual seat. Dave was already there, waiting. He didn’t say anything at first, his expression neutral, but there was a palpable weight in the air.

"You okay?" Alex asked, noticing the quiet tension.

Dave nodded, but his eyes were distant. "Yeah. Just tired, I guess."

Alex sat down and began adjusting the monitors, though her thoughts were elsewhere. She had a feeling that something wasn’t right, something she couldn’t quite place. The mall had been quiet, yes, but it was the kind of quiet that felt wrong. The fountain’s drip, the sound of the wind outside, the hum of the lights—it all seemed to be pressing in on her.

"Tom quit," Dave said abruptly, breaking the silence.

Alex blinked, not sure if she had heard him correctly. "What? Why?"

"He saw something," Dave continued, his voice low. "A shadow. He said it looked like you."

Alex frowned, confusion washing over her. "What do you mean, ‘looked like me’?"

"He saw a shadow figure on the second floor," Dave explained. "He said it looked exactly like you, just standing there, not moving. He shined his light on it, but when the beam hit, it was gone."

Alex felt a chill run down her spine. "And he left? Just like that?"

"Yeah," Dave said, rubbing his eyes. "He was freaked out. Said he couldn’t stay after that."

Alex sat back in her chair, her thoughts spinning. A shadow that looked like me? It felt like an absurd nightmare, but part of her couldn’t ignore the weight of what Dave had said. It wasn’t just a random occurrence. Something had made Tom so afraid that he had quit, just like that.

"What the hell is going on in this place?" she muttered to herself.

The Shift Begins
With Tom gone, Alex and Dave were left to cover the shift. It was a strange feeling, knowing that one of their own had walked out, unable to handle whatever strange force was at play here. But they had a job to do, and as always, the mall was waiting for them to make sure it stayed secure.

The night was quiet, almost eerily so. The storm had passed, and the mall was completely still, its empty hallways stretching out in front of them like an endless void. The sound of the fountain’s drip was the only thing that broke the silence.

Alex couldn’t shake the feeling that something was watching her. Something had changed since Tom’s departure. It felt like the mall itself was alive, waiting for them to slip up, to miss something.

Dave seemed lost in thought, occasionally glancing over at the monitors. He was still quiet, but Alex could tell he was just as unsettled as she was. They walked through the corridors, checking each store and hallway, but no matter how much they looked, the unease refused to leave them.

The Fountain’s Drip
They passed the fountain again, and Alex couldn’t help but pause for a moment. The water in the basin had risen even higher since the last shift, creeping closer to the edge. The steady drip-drip-drip of water filled the air, the sound now almost deafening in the silence of the night.

"Still leaking," Alex muttered, her voice distant.

"Yeah," Dave said, barely looking at it. "It’s been like that for days now."

Alex glanced at the fountain again. The water hadn’t spilled over yet, but it was getting dangerously close. She couldn’t shake the thought that something was wrong with it, that it wasn’t just a busted pipe. There was a strange feeling about it—the way the water rose slowly, almost too slowly, like it was waiting for something.

The Arcade – An Uneasy Familiarity
The arcade was next on their list. Alex and Dave walked through the quiet, darkened space, the flickering machines casting long shadows across the floor. It was the same as always—abandoned, silent—but tonight, there was something off about it. The machines felt almost alive, their faded screens like hollow eyes staring back at them.

"Anything on the monitors?" Alex asked, glancing over at Dave, who had stopped to check the cameras.

"Same as before," Dave muttered, tapping on the screen. "Nothing’s changed. No weird power surges, no flickering lights."

"Let’s keep moving," Alex said, her voice tinged with unease. The arcade always felt too quiet, too still. It was a place that should have been full of noise and laughter, but now it was just an empty shell of what it once was.

The End of the Shift
The final minutes of their shift stretched on. The mall, still and quiet, felt like it was holding its breath. The fountain continued its endless drip, and the arcade remained unchanged. But the tension in the air was palpable, growing heavier with each passing moment.

By the time 3:00 AM rolled around, the shift was finally over. Claire, Brett, and the rest of the crew would take over. Alex and Dave exchanged a few words, but both were too tired to talk much. The night had felt long, filled with a sense of dread that neither of them could shake.

"I’ll see you tomorrow," Alex said quietly, standing up to leave the security room.

"Yeah," Dave said, his voice flat. "Get some sleep."

As Alex walked out of the room, she glanced over at the fountain one last time. The water had risen even higher, but it still hadn’t overflowed. She could hear the sound of it in her mind now, as if it were following her.

The silence in the mall had become deafening. And somewhere, deep in the back of her mind, a thought lingered: What was it that Tom had seen?


Chapter 14: Night Six – The Quiet Tension
The night had settled into its usual pattern: quiet, monotonous, and uneventful. The shift had moved smoothly, with Alex and Dave continuing their patrol, checking the monitors, and walking the darkened halls. But something in the back of Alex’s mind nagged at her. The sensation of being watched had only grown stronger, despite the calmness of the mall.

When Claire and Brett entered the security room for their second shift, the tension in the air was palpable, but the exterior of the mall still remained eerily silent.

"How’s it been so far?" Claire asked, her voice breaking the silence as she and Brett sat down at the monitors.

Alex glanced up, her face tired but alert. "Same as always. Quiet. The fountain’s still dripping, but that’s about it."

Dave gave a small nod of acknowledgment. "Nothing to report here either."

The mall, in its vast emptiness, felt like it was suspended in time. No sign of the strange occurrences that had unsettled them before. No arcade machines turning on, no shadowy figures or flickering lights. It was just the steady drip of the fountain and the quiet hum of the lights.

The Fountain’s Drip
But as they walked the halls, Claire couldn’t ignore the fountain, its steady drip growing louder with each passing minute. She had checked it earlier that night—it was just like the previous nights—but now, as she approached it again, she couldn’t shake the feeling that something was different.

The water level in the basin had risen significantly. The steady drip, drip, drip echoed in the empty space, more pronounced than ever. The water was nearing the edge now, just inches away from spilling over.

"Do you think it’s ever going to stop?" Claire asked Brett, her voice low.

"I don’t know," Brett replied, his gaze fixed on the fountain. "Maybe it’s just a faulty pipe. It’s been going on for days."

But something about the fountain didn’t sit right with Claire. The water had been steadily increasing, and it felt almost like it was waiting for something, like it had a purpose. She could hear the sound of it constantly, even as they moved away from the food court and further into the mall. It was as if the drip was following them.

"Let’s just take care of it before it overflows," Claire suggested, stepping closer to the fountain. "We’ll remove some of the water, keep it under control."

Brett nodded, looking up at the steadily rising water. He grabbed a nearby bucket and handed it to Claire. "I don’t know why it’s still going, but we can at least try to keep it from flooding."

Together, they started to remove the excess water, dumping it into the bucket as it steadily collected. It was a simple, mundane task, but the quiet, constant drip from the fountain was unsettling. It felt like an endless cycle, a small task that was becoming almost symbolic of the rest of their time in the mall—routine, but with an undercurrent of something wrong.

As Claire dumped the water into another bucket, she glanced at the security monitors. Everything seemed fine on the cameras—no strange figures, no flickering lights. But the sense of wrongness didn’t go away. It was like the fountain’s water had become a metaphor for their situation—always rising, never quite overflowing, but always there, always persistent.

A Routine with a Flicker of Unease
The rest of their rounds went by without incident. The arcade remained silent, the empty stores stood as they always had, and the water in the fountain was finally under control, for now. But despite the lack of activity, Claire couldn’t shake the feeling that something was waiting just beneath the surface.

Brett seemed to share her unease, his eyes flicking toward the monitors occasionally, though he said nothing. Neither of them mentioned the shadowy figure that Tom had seen. The mall had been unnervingly quiet, and they both wondered if Tom had seen something real—or if it was just the toll the job had taken on him.

By the time the clock struck 3 AM, their shift was almost over. The second shift would take over soon, but the mall, as always, seemed to be holding its breath. Everything was still, but the constant drip of the fountain never stopped.

End of the Shift
As they made their way back to the security room, the quiet lull of the mall seemed to press in on them. It was as though the silence had taken on a weight, one that was hard to ignore.

Claire, Brett, Alex, and Dave exchanged their final reports, but no one seemed eager to linger. The unease had settled over them, like a fog that refused to lift.

"Well," Claire said, looking back toward the fountain one last time. "The water’s under control. Let’s call it a night."

Brett nodded, though his gaze lingered on the darkened corners of the mall. "Yeah, let’s just get through this. It’s been... too quiet."

Chapter 15: Night Seven – The Calm Before the Storm
The mall had always been quiet during the graveyard shift, but tonight it felt different. The weight of the silence seemed heavier, pressing in on Alex and Dave as they sat in the security room, waiting for the clock to tick past the hours. The hum of the lights, the distant hum of the air vents, and the steady drip of the fountain in the food court filled the air. But the mall’s stillness felt unnatural tonight—like something was about to break.

Alex shifted uncomfortably in her chair, glancing over at Dave. He sat across from her, his eyes flicking between the monitors, but there was a distance in his gaze, an unsettling tension that hadn’t been there before. He hadn’t spoken much since Tom’s departure, and it was clear that something had shifted in the group.

"I don’t know," Alex said, breaking the silence. "Something feels off tonight. I can’t shake it."

Dave didn’t answer immediately. He just nodded, as if he’d been feeling the same thing. "I know what you mean," he said, his voice low. "It’s like... the place is waiting for something."

Alex stood up, stretching her arms. "We’ve been saying that for days. But tonight, it feels different."

The sound of their footsteps echoed as they began their rounds, walking through the dark corridors of the mall. It was just them now—Claire and Brett were off for the night, taking a well-deserved break after their double shifts. Alex and Dave were left to keep watch over the massive building.

The Drip, The Drip...
As they walked past the food court, the fountain was as it had always been—slowly dripping, the water rising ever so slightly in the basin. Alex couldn’t help but glance at it, feeling the sense of dread that had become so familiar. The drip had continued relentlessly, and the basin now held a few more inches of water than it had the previous night.

"I swear this thing is getting worse," Alex muttered, looking at the fountain again. The water was barely contained, creeping closer to the edge. "Do you think the plumbing’s just messed up, or is it... something else?"

Dave paused, looking at the fountain. "I don’t know. But it’s definitely not normal."

Alex could feel her pulse quicken. The water had been rising for days, and tonight, it seemed like it was on the verge of spilling over. But even more than that, it was the sensation in the air—the feeling that something was watching them.

The Arcade: Something's Wrong
Their patrol took them deeper into the mall, and soon, they found themselves in the arcade. It was a place they had grown used to, the silence of the machines a constant companion. The arcade had never been operational since the mall had closed, its machines left to gather dust. But as they walked past the old machines tonight, Alex felt a cold shiver run down her spine.

"Look at that," Dave said quietly, pointing to one of the machines on the far side. It was glowing faintly in the dark.

Alex squinted, unsure if she was seeing things. The arcade machine—an old, beaten-up one—was emitting a faint light from its screen. There were no sounds, no movement, just the eerie glow of the screen.

Alex felt her heart skip a beat. "That wasn’t on when we walked through here earlier," she said, her voice tight.

"Nope," Dave agreed. "I checked the cameras—everything was off before."

He stepped closer to the machine, his flashlight flicking across the screen. The light pulsed, then flickered—just like it had the night Tom had left.

"Let’s just move past it," Alex said quickly, stepping away from the machine. But as they turned, the sound of a faint static hum filled the space around them. It wasn’t loud, but it was there—an almost imperceptible buzz, like the machine was waking up.

Dave paused, turning back to the machine, but when he looked at it again, the screen had gone black.

"Forget it," Alex said, already moving ahead. "Let’s keep going."

The Hallways and the Shadows
The rest of the patrol felt normal, but the weight of what had happened in the arcade hung over them. Neither Alex nor Dave mentioned it again as they moved through the dark hallways, checking entrances, and making sure the mall remained secure.

They passed the food court again, and the fountain’s drip was louder now. Almost... insistent. But there was something else in the air tonight—an electrical charge, a crackling that made their skin crawl.

"Did you hear that?" Alex suddenly asked, halting in her tracks. She had heard a sound, a rustling in the distance. A soft scuffling, like someone was walking just out of sight.

Dave froze, his eyes darting to the shadows. "I didn’t hear anything."

But Alex had heard it clearly. She could almost feel it now—someone, or something, moving through the mall with them. It wasn’t just the wind, it wasn’t the storm, and it definitely wasn’t the usual creaks of the building settling. This was different. Something was out there.

"I heard it," Alex whispered again, stepping closer to Dave. "It’s like... someone’s walking. But there’s no one else here."

The two of them stood still, listening. The only sound was the constant drip of the fountain.

The Fountain Finally Overflows
A few moments later, a soft splashing sound broke the silence. Alex turned quickly to see the fountain had finally overflowed, the water spilling over the edge of the basin, spilling onto the floor.

"Shit," Dave muttered, his flashlight illuminating the growing puddle of water. "It’s flooding now."

Alex couldn’t shake the feeling that this was more than just a broken pipe. The water had been rising for days, slowly, quietly—and now it had overflowed in the dead of night.

They stood there for a moment, watching the water spread across the floor, knowing that there was nothing they could do about it. The mall felt colder now, the silence louder, and the air thicker with an unspoken tension.

"Let’s just... finish the rounds," Alex said, her voice tight. "We’re almost done. It’s nothing we can fix right now."

The End of the Shift
By the time 3:00 AM rolled around, the fountain was still overflowing. The water had spread across the floor, slowly creeping toward the hallway. Alex and Dave finished their rounds in silence, neither of them speaking of the unsettling events they had witnessed tonight—the flickering arcade machine, the shadow that seemed to haunt the mall, and the sense of something waiting just beyond the walls.

When the shift ended, they were both exhausted. Claire and Brett arrived to take over, and Alex and Dave exchanged their brief reports, but neither of them could shake the feeling that something was watching them, waiting.

As Alex stepped out of the security room to go on break, she glanced one last time at the fountain. The water was still flowing, still spilling over, and the drip continued.


Chapter 16: Night Seven – The Sudden Stillness
Claire and Brett stepped into the security room, their shift beginning at 3 AM. The air felt different now—heavier, as if the night was holding its breath. The water in the fountain had just recently spilled over, flooding the basin and creating a quiet mess of puddles around the floor. The fountain had been a constant presence—its steady drip filling the silence of the mall. But now?

Now, there was nothing.

The fountain had completely dried up.

Claire paused just inside the security room, her eyes glued to the monitors. "Wait... something’s off," she muttered under her breath.

Brett followed her gaze to the feed of the food court where the fountain should have been. But now, it was completely dry. No water. Just cracked tiles and a faint outline of moisture where the water had been moments before.

"What the hell...?" Claire whispered, stepping closer to the screen.

They both exchanged uneasy glances.

"I swear it was overflowing when we left," Brett said, his voice tense. "We saw it just minutes ago. It was spilling over."

"I don’t know," Claire said, her fingers hovering over the controls. "Maybe... maybe there’s something wrong with the pipes? But it’s just... too strange."

The silence between them stretched, punctuated only by the hum of the lights overhead and the soft beep of the monitors.

The Arcade
As Claire and Brett moved out of the security room to begin their rounds, they passed the fountain again. The water was completely gone now, and the surrounding area was oddly dry. There was no sign of the flood that had just occurred.

They kept walking, moving down the long corridors of the mall. The familiar darkness of the arcade loomed ahead.

"Let’s check the arcade first," Brett suggested, his voice low. He glanced at Claire, his unease palpable. "I feel like there’s something weird about it."

"Agreed," Claire said. They made their way to the arcade, the air growing colder the closer they got. The faint hum of the machines, the constant buzz of forgotten technology, seemed to echo in the vast space.

When they entered the arcade, it didn’t look any different at first glance. But as their eyes adjusted to the dim light, they both froze. The rows of arcade machines, which had always stood stagnant and silent, were missing several of the larger machines.

"What the hell?" Claire muttered.

Brett turned to her, his voice a mix of disbelief and confusion. "Did you see this earlier? There were way more machines than this."

"Yeah," Claire said, her voice tight. "There should be at least six more cabinets. And they’re all... gone."

They walked through the arcade, their footsteps slow as they surveyed the empty spaces. The absence of the arcade machines was strange enough, but it was the fact that the missing machines all had one thing in common: they had been in the direct line of sight of the cameras.

They both approached the cameras, their eyes scanning the footage from earlier in the night. The footage was clear—there had been machines, and now they were simply... gone. Disappeared.

Claire’s mind raced as she tried to process what was happening. "How could they just vanish like that? There’s no way someone moved them that fast."

Brett rubbed his eyes. "I don’t get it. This place is huge. There’s no way someone could just cart away six arcade machines in the span of a shift without anyone noticing."

Claire’s hand hovered over the control panel as she rewound the feed. They watched the footage again, but nothing had changed. The machines were there one minute, and then... they weren’t. It was as if they had simply been erased from existence.

"I’m... I’m going to check the other cameras," Claire said, her voice unsteady as she flicked through the feeds. "Maybe we missed something."

The Unexplainable
As Claire skimmed through the other security feeds, she froze again. The footage from the second floor—where they had previously patrolled—showed a completely different view. There was no sign of the machines that had been in the arcade.

"Where did they go?" Brett asked, his voice hushed, as if the answer might be too disturbing to voice aloud.

Claire didn’t answer at first. She watched the footage in stunned silence, her mind racing. Everything was still. No one had come in or out of the arcade. The machines had simply vanished in the blink of an eye.

"Did they... get moved?" Brett asked again, his voice tinged with disbelief.

"I don’t know," Claire said, feeling the weight of the unease that had been creeping up on them since the moment they’d stepped into the mall. "But... it doesn’t make any sense."

The fountain had dried up, the arcade machines had vanished, and yet, everything else seemed too quiet. It was like the mall was playing some twisted game with them—showing them something they couldn’t explain.

"We need to go check the rest of the mall," Claire said, feeling the tension mounting. "Maybe it’s a glitch, or something’s... something’s going wrong."

"Right," Brett said, though he didn’t sound convinced. He was already looking over his shoulder as if he could feel eyes on him, even in the dark emptiness.

The Fountain’s Return
They continued their patrol, the stillness of the mall growing more oppressive with each passing minute. They checked the other floors, walking past the empty stores and silent hallways. But nothing seemed to be out of place. No one was there.

And then, as they rounded the corner back to the food court, Claire stopped short.

The fountain.

It was... back.

Water had started to flow from the spout again, the sound of it splashing into the basin filling the silence. It was as though the fountain had never been dry at all. The water level had already risen slightly.

"Are you seeing this?" Brett whispered.

"Yeah," Claire said, her voice shaking with disbelief. "This doesn’t make sense."

The fountain was flowing, just like it always had—no sign of the dry basin, no sign of the overflow. It was like the cycle had reset, but why?

The quiet drip-drip-drip continued, as if nothing had changed.


Chapter 17: Night Eight – Chased by Shadows
The mall was quieter tonight, the aftermath of the past few nights settling in like an unspoken weight. But for Alex and Dave, there was no escaping the tension. The storm had passed, the drip from the fountain had stopped, and the arcade machines had mysteriously vanished. The atmosphere had changed—unnervingly so.

Alex and Dave entered the security room at 9 PM, preparing for their shift. Claire and Brett had already filled them in about the fountain being dry and the arcade machines disappearing.

"Did they just... disappear?" Alex asked, her voice low. She couldn’t help but feel a sense of dread building as she glanced over at the monitors. The mall felt more oppressive tonight than it ever had before.

Brett nodded, his hands trembling slightly as he adjusted his headset. "Yeah. They were just... gone. The machines that were right in front of the cameras. Just vanished. We checked every angle and couldn’t find anything. It’s like they never existed."

Alex shivered, but it wasn’t from the cold. "But... how? They weren’t moved. They were just... gone. No sign of them."

Dave, who had been quiet up until now, nodded in agreement. "That doesn’t make sense. The machines were there, and then they weren’t. It’s like they’ve been erased."

Claire stood up from the security desk, running her hands through her hair. "And the fountain—it was overflowing when we left. Now, it’s completely dry. It’s like time’s been reset. I don’t know what to make of it anymore."

Alex felt the weight of their words settle in her chest. Every report, every piece of weirdness piled up like a mountain they were all too afraid to climb.

"You think it’s the mall?" Brett asked, his eyes fixed on the monitors. "Something wrong with the plumbing or just... everything?"

"Maybe," Claire said slowly. "But it doesn’t feel like that, does it? I don’t think it’s just faulty pipes or some weird coincidence."

The tension hung thick in the room, but they didn’t have much time to dwell on it. They had a shift to work, and the mall was waiting for them to keep watch. The shifts had become an eerie routine, but tonight... it felt different. The mall, in all its vastness, felt like it was holding something, waiting.

The Night Begins
Alex and Dave left the security room first, moving silently down the dimly lit hallways. The empty stores stood like silent sentinels, watching them pass, their dark windows reflecting their faint lights.

They split up after a few minutes, each taking a different hallway to check on the mall’s perimeter. The silence of the place was suffocating, each creak and hum of the building louder than usual in the eerie stillness.

Alex’s flashlight bounced off the walls as she moved through the second floor. Her footsteps were too loud in the silence. It had been a while since she’d felt so on edge—ever since Tom had left, the place felt different. The mall, once a place of routine, now felt more like a trap.

As she passed an abandoned storefront, her flashlight flickered for a moment. She stopped, frowning. The beam seemed to hesitate, like it had trouble staying steady. She adjusted it and continued walking, but the hairs on the back of her neck stood up. Something felt wrong.

And then, as if it had materialized out of thin air, she saw it.

A figure.

It was a shadow, too familiar. Too real.

Tom.

Her breath hitched in her chest, and for a moment, she thought her mind was playing tricks on her. But the shadow was moving toward her—quickly, and it didn’t seem like it would stop. Alex froze, her body paralyzed in fear. She couldn’t breathe, couldn’t move, couldn’t think.

The figure that looked like Tom was moving toward her with an unnatural speed, its shadowy form getting closer with every heartbeat.

"No... no, no, no..." Alex whispered to herself, her voice cracking with panic. She backed away, stumbling over her feet, her heart pounding in her chest.

"Dave! Dave!" she screamed, but the words came out strangled, desperate. She turned to run, her footsteps echoing in the silence, but the shadow was still there, moving after her, gaining on her.

She turned the corner, the figure still right behind her, and as she ran, she could feel the cold presence of the shadow pressing in on her. She couldn’t escape it. She was trapped in this nightmare, in this dark mall, with no one around to help.

The Chase
Alex dashed down another corridor, her breath ragged in her throat. She needed to find Dave, she needed to get to safety. She wasn’t going to survive this alone.

But every time she turned a corner, the shadow was there, following her. Every time she looked over her shoulder, it was just a few steps away.

Finally, she burst through the security room door, panting heavily, her eyes wild with fear.

"Dave! Dave!" she screamed, looking around frantically for him.

Dave looked up from the monitors, his face confused, but then it shifted to something darker as he saw her.

"What’s wrong?" he asked, standing up, his voice full of concern.

Alex could barely speak. She was shaking, her hands trembling as she pointed toward the hallway she had just come from.

"It was Tom. It was him! He—he was chasing me! I saw him—his shadow, it was like he was right there. I swear I saw him!" Her voice cracked, barely able to get the words out.

Dave didn’t move at first. Then, slowly, he stood up and walked over to the security cameras, scanning through the footage.

"Tom?" he asked, his voice flat. He clicked through the cameras quickly, watching as Alex had crossed the second floor. When he reached the feed that covered her path, he paused.

There it was.

A shadow, moving behind her. The figure of Tom. It was unmistakable. And the figure seemed to be chasing her. It moved with a strange, unnatural fluidity. The movement matched exactly what Alex had described.

"Oh my God," Dave whispered under his breath.

He turned to Alex, his eyes wide with disbelief. "I saw it too."

Alex stumbled back against the wall, her breath catching in her throat. "I... I saw him, Dave. I swear. He was right behind me. It was like he was real, but not real."

Dave felt a chill run through him as he watched the footage again. The shadow had disappeared from view just as Alex had reached the security room. He had seen the same thing, and yet, it didn’t make any sense.

Alex’s legs gave way beneath her, and she sank to the floor, gasping for air. She couldn’t stay here. Not in the mall. Not after everything that had happened. She had to leave.

The Decision
Alex’s shaking hands grabbed the radio. "I can’t do this anymore," she said, her voice cracking as she spoke into the device. "I’m done. I’m quitting. I can’t stay here."

Dave looked at her, the weight of her words hitting him hard. "Alex, no... Please, just—"

But Alex was already shaking her head. "I’m done. I can’t be here. I can’t. I can’t deal with this anymore."

The terror in her eyes was enough to make Dave pause. He looked at her, the same fear slowly creeping into his own chest. He had seen the footage. He believed her. But there was more to this than just a shadow.

"You’re right," Dave said softly, stepping back. "I can’t do this either."


Chapter 18: Night Eight – The Final Shift
The mall’s stillness wrapped around Alex and Dave like a suffocating blanket. Every corner, every hallway, every flicker of the lights felt heavy, haunted by the memories of the night. The shadow that Alex had seen still clung to her mind like a cold, lingering dread.

As the last few minutes of their shift ticked by, they barely spoke. The quiet hum of the monitors and the faint drip of the fountain filled the space between them, but it was the unspoken tension that made the air thick and suffocating.

When the clock struck 3 AM, they knew the second shift had to take over. But neither of them could ignore the growing unease that had only deepened since Tom left.

"Hey," Alex said, her voice tight. She turned to Dave, her expression worn. "We need to talk to Brett and Claire before we go."

Dave didn’t need to ask why. He already knew.

The Warning
Brett and Claire had just entered the security room, taking over for Alex and Dave. They were tired, but there was a determined look in their eyes—a stark contrast to Alex and Dave’s own exhaustion.

Alex stood up from her chair, her body stiff with nerves, and looked at Dave. They shared a brief, silent moment before Alex spoke.

"We need to tell you something," Alex started, her voice shaking slightly as she glanced at Brett and Claire. "It’s about what happened tonight."

Claire gave a nod, her eyes scanning both Alex and Dave. "What happened?"

Alex took a deep breath, trying to steady her nerves. "Tom saw something. A shadow. It looked like him, but it wasn’t really him. I... I saw it too, Claire. It was chasing me. It felt real. It felt like I couldn’t escape it."

Brett raised an eyebrow, clearly skeptical. "A shadow chasing you?" he asked, his voice laced with doubt.

"Yeah," Dave spoke up, his voice low and heavy with the weight of his own realization. "We checked the footage. We saw the same thing. It was there, moving behind Alex. We can’t explain it, but we know what we saw."

Claire and Brett exchanged a glance, but neither of them seemed convinced. "So you’re telling me you’re quitting because of a shadow?" Claire asked, her voice sharp. "That’s a little hard to swallow, don’t you think?"

Alex took a deep breath, feeling her frustration rising. "We’ve been dealing with strange stuff for days now. The fountain, the arcade machines—this is no coincidence. We’ve been here long enough to know something’s wrong."

Dave stood next to Alex, nodding. "We’re not coming back. I’m telling you both—it’s not worth it. Whatever’s happening here... it’s bigger than us. We’re done."

Brett looked at them, a mix of disbelief and annoyance crossing his face. "You’re just going to walk away? You’ve been here for weeks, and now you’re just going to quit because of a shadow?"

"I’m not going to risk it anymore, Brett," Alex said, her voice steady. "We’re done."

The Departure
It took a few more minutes of back-and-forth, but eventually, Claire and Brett seemed to accept that Alex and Dave weren’t going to change their minds. The tension in the room was thick, the air vibrating with the unspoken truth that something was wrong, but no one was ready to fully confront it.

Without saying another word, Alex and Dave grabbed their things. Their footsteps echoed in the empty hallways as they made their way to the exit.

"Stay safe," Dave muttered under his breath as they walked out.

Alex’s hand hovered on the door handle for a second, her heart pounding in her chest. She didn’t look back, but she knew the weight of what they were leaving behind. It wasn’t just the mall—it was the feeling that they couldn’t fight anymore.

They stepped into the night air, the cool breeze hitting their faces like a wake-up call. The silence of the outside world was a stark contrast to the stillness that had taken over the mall.

The First Hour
Back inside the mall, Brett and Claire stood silently, the weight of Alex and Dave’s departure settling on their shoulders. They exchanged a long look, and Claire finally spoke.

"Well, this is it," she said, breaking the silence. "We’re on our own now."

Brett nodded, but there was something uneasy in his eyes. "Yeah," he said, looking down the hallway. "But we can’t just leave. We still have a job to do."

They both knew that even if they didn’t fully believe in what Alex and Dave had experienced, they couldn’t just walk away. Not now.

The first hour passed in silence as Brett and Claire checked the monitors and did their rounds. The mall felt different now—empty in a way that was more pronounced, more oppressive. It wasn’t just the physical absence of Alex and Dave. It was the emptiness that had settled in the space between them.

They walked through the food court, the same familiar route they’d taken a thousand times, but tonight, the stillness felt heavier. The fountain, once dry, was now strangely quiet. No dripping sound filled the air. The arcade was silent, the machines dark. The world of the mall, once bustling with activity, now felt like a tomb.

In the second floor hallways, everything was still. Nothing out of the ordinary, just the flickering of the lights and the occasional hum of the HVAC system.

But there was an unease hanging in the air. Something was wrong, but neither Brett nor Claire could put their finger on it. The first hour of their shift passed uneventfully, but the silence pressed in on them, thick and suffocating.





Chapter 19: Night Eight – The Return of the Storm
The first hour of their shift had passed in a strange, almost serene silence. Brett and Claire moved through the mall, patrolling the empty corridors as the hours stretched on. It wasn’t as if they had expected anything to happen, but there was an unspoken understanding that something was building. Something was about to break.

For now, the mall—Emberfield Mall—stood still, its immense space holding secrets in its darkened corners. The name had once felt hopeful, almost like the beginning of something grand. But now, it felt hollow, as if it had lost its meaning. Emberfield Mall, a once-thriving commercial hub, was now a tomb. The flickering lights and the echoes of forgotten machines only added to the sense of unease that clung to the space.

The air had shifted, too—cooler now, the faint smell of rain creeping in through the vents. Claire felt a chill run down her spine, but she dismissed it as nothing more than the change in the weather.

The Return of the Storm
A rumble of thunder in the distance interrupted their thoughts.

"Is the storm coming back?" Claire asked, glancing up at the ceiling. The sky outside had been clear when they had first arrived, but now the air felt thick with tension. The wind howled outside, rattling the windows.

Brett stopped in his tracks. "It sounds like it," he said, frowning. "The pressure’s changed. Something’s up."

The mall had always been a space of stillness, but tonight, it felt different. The storm was rolling in, fast and violent, like it had been waiting for the right moment to return.

The heavy rain began to pour outside, the winds howling against the walls of the building. Thunder cracked across the sky, shaking the foundation of the mall. As Claire and Brett made their way back toward the fountain, the storm outside became impossible to ignore. The lights flickered above them, casting strange shadows on the walls.

But then, something else happened. A loud crash echoed through the mall, and before they could react, the glass above the fountain shattered with a deafening sound.

The Glass Shatters
Claire and Brett both jumped, spinning around to face the source of the noise. The massive atrium above the fountain—once a beautiful feature of the mall—was now a wreck. Shards of glass rained down into the fountain, scattering across the floor like shattered dreams. The storm had returned with a vengeance, but it seemed as though the destruction was already in progress.

"Shit!" Claire shouted, her voice rising in panic as the glass continued to fall. The sound of it hitting the floor was almost too much to bear, a constant barrage of crashing noise that made it hard to think.

Brett immediately reached for his radio, his hand shaking as he called for backup. "We need to secure this area. There’s glass everywhere. The roof... it’s gone."

Claire, her heart racing, took a step back from the fountain, her eyes darting to the ceiling. The glass shards had fallen everywhere, but it didn’t seem to be the wind that caused the shattering. Something more—unnatural—had happened.

She watched as the fountain’s basin began to fill again. The water, once dry, now rose slowly, the sound of it filling the air with a low, almost mournful rhythm. The fountain was alive again, but the silence that followed the storm felt unnatural, oppressive.

The Unease Grows
The rain outside poured harder, and the thunder shook the walls. Claire’s thoughts were racing as she tried to make sense of what had just happened. The fountain had dried up earlier, the water had been removed, but now it was back—more intense than before. And the glass shattering above them—it didn’t make any sense.

Brett stood by the radio, his face pale as he relayed the situation to the others. "The glass is gone, the fountain’s filling up again. We need to do something about this."

Claire nodded, her mind racing. "We need to find out what’s happening. This is beyond just a malfunction. Something’s going on."

Brett turned, his eyes narrowing as he surveyed the damage. "There’s no way this is just a storm. That fountain... it shouldn’t be working again, not after what happened earlier. It’s like the whole place is... waking up."

The storm’s howling winds outside pressed against the walls of the mall, as if trying to break through. But the real danger wasn’t outside anymore—it was within.

Chapter 20: Night Eight – The Waiting Game
The storm raged on outside, its fury shaking the walls of the mall. Inside, the air was thick with unease, and the shattered glass from the atrium seemed to amplify the growing tension. Brett and Claire stood in the midst of the chaos, staring at the water that had mysteriously returned to the fountain’s basin.

The sound of the storm pounding against the windows was deafening, but inside the security room, the silence felt heavier. Every second that passed without the others arriving made the situation feel more dire.

"We need to get a repair team in here," Claire said, her voice tight as she wiped the dampness from her brow. The shattered glass in the atrium felt like a symbol of everything that was breaking around them. She quickly grabbed the radio, her fingers trembling as she pressed the button.

“Uh, we’ve got an issue with the fountain. And the glass—it's all over the food court. We need someone in here, fast,” Claire said into the radio, her voice sharp with urgency. “Can anyone hear me?”

The radio crackled in response, but nothing clear came through. She cursed under her breath, her grip tightening around the radio. It was useless. She couldn’t get through to anyone.

Brett walked over to the security desk, his mind racing. "We’ll have to call the repair team directly," he said, reaching for the phone. But as he dialed, the phone line buzzed, then clicked into silence.

"Shit," Brett muttered, his frustration growing. He dialed again, his finger punching the numbers in rapid succession, but the result was the same—no connection.

Claire’s eyes flicked to the monitors, her brow furrowed. "We need to keep trying. We can’t just wait here."

The fountain had stopped dripping for a moment, but the stillness of the water felt unnatural. It wasn’t just the fountain—it was everything. The mall was too silent, and there was too much that didn’t make sense. No one had come to check on the damage yet, and they were completely alone.

Desperate Attempts
Brett continued to dial the number over and over, each attempt only deepening their isolation. The phone refused to connect, and the radio remained silent. Claire's mind raced, a thousand thoughts all vying for attention, but one thing stood out more than the rest—how long had they been trying to get through?

“How long has it been now?” she asked quietly, her voice cracking as she looked at the clock on the wall.

Brett didn’t answer right away. He could feel the weight of her question, the growing fear that they were alone in the mall—trapped in an empty shell of a place that had once been full of life. He checked his watch.

“An hour,” he said grimly. “We’ve been trying for an hour.”

“Great,” Claire muttered, pacing in front of the monitors. She glanced back at the security feed, and for the first time since they’d started their shift, she felt the familiar rush of dread creeping in. The mall was empty, as it always had been, but tonight it felt more so. It felt abandoned.

She pressed a hand against the back of her neck, trying to shake the anxiety that was starting to settle in her bones.

The Silence that Follows
The sound of the storm outside suddenly cut off as the power flickered, and the lights in the security room dimmed for a fraction of a second before flicking back to life.

“God, I hate when it does that,” Brett said under his breath. He stepped over to the window, looking out at the storm, the rain still falling in torrents, but there was something else. It felt... different. The streetlights that should have been visible through the window were obscured by thick sheets of rain, the mall parking lot dark and empty. A perfect silence surrounded them—like the storm outside had come to a complete standstill.

Claire joined him at the window, her gaze searching the horizon, but she saw nothing but the bleak emptiness of the parking lot. No signs of movement. No rescue team pulling in. No one to help them. Just the flickering of the overhead lights in the atrium, casting a dim, almost eerie light on the empty halls below.

"Where the hell are they?" Claire murmured. She felt the frustration building again, but now it was mixed with an uncomfortable fear. "This is getting ridiculous."

Brett didn’t respond at first, still staring out into the void. It wasn’t just the phone lines, it wasn’t just the radio; it felt like they were being cut off from everything. And the feeling only deepened with each passing minute.

The Uneasy Calm
The first hour passed, and nothing had changed. Brett and Claire sat in the security room, both staring at the monitors, feeling the weight of the silence pressing in around them. The water in the fountain had stopped, leaving only the dry basin as a reminder of the strange happenings earlier in the shift. The arcade remained dark, its machines silent. It was as if the mall had settled into a kind of waiting—waiting for something.

"Should we call the others again?" Claire asked, her voice shaking. "Do you think we should just leave and try to get out of here?"

Brett shook his head slowly. "No. We can’t. We have to stick it out. We’re in this. I’m not leaving without knowing what the hell is going on here."

The minutes stretched into an hour, and the fear in Claire’s chest grew. It wasn’t just the unresponsiveness of the radios or the phones. It was the waiting. It was the quiet. The feeling that something was on the edge of breaking—but what?

As the second hour stretched on, they could hear the faint, distant sound of the storm picking up again. The wind howled in the distance, and Brett’s hand went to the window. He could see the faint flicker of lightning far off in the distance, still far enough to feel like it was part of the storm's last dying breath.

But something in the air was wrong. And just as that thought crossed Brett’s mind...

The lights flickered again.




Chapter 20: Night Eight – The Haunting on Camera
Brett and Claire’s hands were shaking as they sat in the security room, the weight of the situation pressing down on them. The storm outside had been growing stronger again, the wind howling through the parking lot, but inside, it was the silence that felt suffocating. They had no idea where the repair team was, and the connection to the outside world seemed increasingly distant.

It had been hours since Alex and Dave had left, and in the dim glow of the security monitors, it felt as if the mall had fallen into an unnatural stillness.

“I hate this,” Claire murmured, her voice barely audible above the pounding of the rain. She rubbed her eyes, tired and frustrated. “Why hasn’t anyone come yet?”

Brett didn’t respond immediately. His gaze was fixed on the monitors, watching the empty halls that had grown increasingly eerie in the absence of their usual patrolling. The usual buzz of the security room had faded, and now the only sound was the heavy rain tapping against the glass. But then—

“Wait,” Brett said, his voice shaking.

Claire snapped her head around. “What? What is it?”

Brett’s hand hovered over the controls. His eyes were locked on one of the camera feeds, a slow panic creeping into his chest. On the screen, the unmistakable figures of Alex and Tom were moving through the hallways, just as if they were on a routine patrol. It wasn’t a shadow. It wasn’t an illusion. It was them.

“Are you seeing this?” Brett asked, his voice tight.

Claire leaned over, peering at the screen. There, walking down the hallway near the old store entrance, were Alex and Tom—clear as day—moving with an eerie calm, their forms too familiar. They were both dressed in their security uniforms, their faces clear as they passed under the flickering overhead lights.

It didn’t make any sense. Alex and Tom had left. They were both gone. Alex had quit, and Tom... Tom had left before her. But there they were, clearly visible on the security feed, patrolling the halls as if nothing had happened.

"No... this can't be," Claire said, her voice barely above a whisper. "They left. They quit."

Brett scrambled to switch the feed between cameras, his heart racing. "I... I don't understand. This doesn’t make sense."

The figures of Alex and Tom continued to move in sync, turning the corner near the food court, their backs visible to the cameras.

"Should we go check?" Claire asked, her voice trembling. She was terrified, but her feet felt glued to the ground. The idea of leaving the security room now felt wrong. It wasn’t just the impossible presence of Alex and Tom; it was the sense that the mall was holding them here, like a trap closing in.

“No,” Brett said, quickly shaking his head. “We can’t. If they’re... if they’re still here, then we need to stay put. We can’t be running around.”

They stared at the cameras for a few moments, both of them silent as the figures of Alex and Tom continued to patrol the now-empty halls. The movements were too smooth, too synchronized. They weren’t walking like people—they weren’t acting like people.

As they watched, a wave of nausea hit Claire. "That doesn’t feel right," she said. "This doesn’t feel real."

Brett felt the same. He had seen it—he had seen them, clear as day. But this wasn’t a coincidence. This wasn’t just a glitch in the feed. There was something in the mall, something wrong, pulling them back.

The Decision
The figures of Alex and Tom faded from the camera, disappearing around a corner. For a moment, neither of them spoke.

"What the hell is happening?" Claire muttered, rubbing her face as she stared at the now-empty camera feed.

Brett was still staring at the monitors, his hands resting against the desk, his mind racing. "I don't know. I don’t know what we’re dealing with here, but this—this isn't right."

Claire stood up from her seat, her legs shaky. “We need to get out of here,” she said, her voice thick with panic. "We have to leave. Whatever this is—it's not safe."

Brett’s eyes flicked back to the cameras, still seeing nothing. “I don’t know if leaving is going to help us. What if they come after us next?”

The thought made Claire’s skin crawl. The idea of staying, though, felt even worse. She couldn’t trust the mall anymore. It was as if everything that had ever been familiar was now foreign. Her grip on the back of the chair tightened, her heart beating faster with each passing second.

“You’re right,” she said. "But we need to get help. We can’t be alone in here."

The Unseen Watching
Suddenly, the camera feed flickered, and for just a split second, the lights above the fountain blinked off. When they came back on, a shadow—not Alex, not Tom, but something else entirely—was standing at the edge of the fountain.

It was tall and dark, its outline indistinct against the background of the shattered glass. Claire’s breath caught in her throat as she watched the figure stand motionless, its presence somehow more ominous than anything they had encountered before.

Brett was the first to speak, his voice a low rasp. “Claire... do you see that?”

She could barely form words as she nodded, unable to look away from the shadow.

It was moving now—slowly, deliberately—towards the center of the fountain.

“We need to leave now,” Claire said, barely able to keep her voice steady.



Chapter 21: Night Eight – The Hollow Reveals Itself
The shadow at the fountain had vanished as quickly as it had appeared, but its presence lingered in the air, hanging heavy between Brett and Claire. The silence in the security room was now unbearable, amplified by the storm still raging outside. Claire’s hands shook as she stared at the now-empty monitors, her thoughts racing, heart pounding.

"Was that... was that Tom?" Claire whispered, almost to herself.

Brett didn’t answer right away. He was still glued to the cameras, eyes scanning every corner of the mall. He could feel the hairs on the back of his neck standing up.

"I... don’t know," he said, his voice barely audible. "But whatever it was, it wasn’t normal."

Claire took a step back, her hand instinctively reaching for the door. "I don’t care anymore," she said. "We need to leave. Now."

Just as she spoke, the first sound came—a low, guttural thud. It came from the hallway outside the security room. Claire froze, her breath catching in her throat.

Thud. Thud. Thud.

The banging was rhythmic, but each strike was harder than the last. The door shuddered with each impact, rattling violently against the frame.

Claire’s eyes widened as the noise became more frantic. Someone—or something—was pounding on the door.

"Who the hell...?" Brett muttered, his voice trembling with a growing panic. He immediately rushed to the window and looked through it. Nothing. The hallway outside the security room was empty.

But then the rattling started.

The door’s knob began to shake, as if something—or someone—on the other side was trying to get in. It creaked under the pressure, but it held firm.

Brett stepped back, his face pale. "It’s not possible... it can’t be..."

And then, the voice came.

It was a low, guttural whisper at first, like a twisted blend of Alex and Tom, distorted and wrong.

"Let me... in..."

The words sent a chill down their spines, like ice water running through their veins.

Claire’s breath hitched, and her pulse quickened. "What... what is that?"

Brett’s hands shook as he fumbled for the radio, his fingers slick with sweat. He tried to press the button, but the radio crackled with static, offering no response.

The voice grew louder, its cadence shifting between Alex’s familiar tones and Tom’s lower, more distorted pitch. The blend was unnatural, twisted, and guttural.

"Let... me... in... Claire... Brett... let me in..." the voice moaned, a chilling plea that sent shivers down Claire’s spine.

The knob rattled violently again, the pressure on the door increasing as though something on the other side was pushing against it with force. Claire’s heart raced, her pulse pounding in her ears.

"It’s not them," Claire whispered, her voice barely audible. "That’s not them. That’s not Alex and Tom."

The voice on the other side let out a low, sickening laugh, a sound that didn’t belong to anything human. It was as if the hollow itself was mocking them, playing with them.

"Let me... in," the voice repeated, now more insistent, more desperate. "Let me... in..."

The door shook again with a deafening bang, the frame creaking under the force. Claire and Brett were both frozen in place, terror gripping them, as they realized the horrifying truth.

It was the hollow.

The thing they had been running from, the thing they had been hiding from, had found them. And it wasn’t going to stop until it got in.

The Desperate Choice
Claire turned to Brett, her face pale and filled with fear. "We need to leave," she said, her voice cracking. "We need to get out of here. It’s not safe."

Brett nodded, his hands shaking as he reached for the door. But just as he touched the handle, the pounding started again, louder this time, almost deafening. The door rattled in its frame, the knob twisting violently as though something on the other side was trying to break it down.

The voice was almost maddening now—Alex’s voice mixed with Tom’s, growing louder with every passing second.

"LET ME IN!" The hollow screamed, the sound like a physical force, pressing against the door. "LET ME IN, NOW!"

Claire and Brett’s breath hitched in their throats as they backed away from the door, eyes wide with terror. They could feel the weight of the hollow pressing in on them, trying to break through.

Then, just as suddenly as it had begun, the pounding stopped.

A terrifying silence filled the room. The shaking of the door ceased, and the sound of the wind howling outside was the only thing left. The only evidence that something had happened was the lingering sense of dread that hung in the air like smoke.

Claire and Brett stood still, staring at the door. Neither of them dared to move.

After what felt like an eternity, Brett spoke in a hoarse whisper.

“What... what the hell just happened?”

Claire didn’t answer right away. She was too afraid to speak, her mind reeling from what she had just heard. She stared at the door, waiting for something—anything—to happen. But there was nothing. The door remained quiet, the only sound the soft echo of the storm outside.

"I don’t know," Claire finally whispered, her voice trembling. "But we need to get out. Now."

Brett didn’t argue. They both knew it was time to leave.



Chapter 22: Night Eight – The Final Decision
The hours stretched on like a fever dream. Brett and Claire sat in the security room, locked in a tense silence. The pounding on the door had stopped, but the feeling of being watched remained. The air felt charged, oppressive, like something was still lingering just outside their sight.

Claire was on edge. Every creak of the building, every shift of the wind outside, sent her heart racing. But the door had remained silent for what felt like hours now. Still, she couldn’t shake the feeling that something was wrong. The hollow was out there. It was waiting.

Brett had been pacing in front of the monitors, staring at the flickering security footage. He wasn’t really seeing it, not anymore. His mind was elsewhere, and Claire could tell. They were both exhausted—physically, mentally, emotionally. But the truth of what they were facing hung in the air like a dark cloud, and neither of them could quite come to terms with it.

It was 9 AM.

The storm had died down, and the once-powerful winds had become a faint murmur. The lights in the mall flickered for a moment, but this time, it wasn’t as unsettling. The storm had passed, but something else—something more insidious—was still hanging over them.

Claire stood up slowly, stretching her stiff legs. She didn’t know how long they had been holed up in the security room, but she could feel the weight of the hours pressing down on her. The stillness in the mall was maddening. It was as if the whole building had been holding its breath.

“We can’t stay here forever,” Claire said, breaking the silence. Her voice was hoarse, but there was a sense of finality in her words.

Brett nodded in agreement, his eyes heavy with fatigue. “I know. It’s not safe here anymore. We have to leave. We have to go now.”

Claire approached the door, her hand hovering over the lock. She paused for a moment, her heart pounding in her chest. Could they really leave? Could they just walk out of this nightmare, and walk away from everything that had happened?

Finally, with a deep breath, she unlocked the door.

The Unexpected Discovery
The door creaked open, and the two of them stepped into the hallway. The mall was eerily quiet, the faint hum of the remaining lights their only company. There was no sign of the shadowy presence that had haunted them for hours.

Claire and Brett exchanged a look, their expressions a mix of relief and caution. They began walking down the hallway, the sound of their footsteps too loud in the stillness. Every turn, every corner felt like a new risk, a new chance for something—someone—to jump out of the darkness.

But as they reached the end of the hallway, something caught Claire’s eye.

There, just outside the security room, lay two familiar figures, sprawled on the floor in a heap. They were unconscious, their faces pale and unmoving.

It was Alex and Tom.

Claire froze, her blood running cold. “Oh my God... no way,” she whispered, rushing forward to kneel beside them. She checked for a pulse, her hands trembling. Both of them were alive, but they were unconscious, lying in the same position that they had left the night before. How were they here? How had they gotten to the security room?

Brett stood behind her, his face pale as he looked down at the two security guards. "This doesn’t make any sense. They... they should’ve been gone by now. They left."

Claire shook her head, her mind spinning. "They... they couldn’t have just appeared out of nowhere. They weren’t here when we locked the door. We would’ve seen them."

"Then how the hell did they get here?" Brett asked, his voice strained with confusion and fear.

The mall felt suffocating again, the air thick with questions that no one had the answers to. The storm outside had passed, but the atmosphere inside felt heavier than ever, like a force was still pressing in on them.

Alex and Tom were now a part of the mystery. Had the hollow brought them here? Or was something else at play?

The Final Choice
Brett and Claire exchanged a glance. It was clear that they couldn’t just leave the mall now, not with this new twist. They had no idea what was happening, but they couldn’t risk leaving without understanding it.

"We can’t leave yet," Claire said, her voice firm despite the fear gnawing at her insides. "We need to figure this out. We need to know what happened to them—and why they’re here."

Brett hesitated for a moment, but nodded. “Yeah. We can’t just walk away from this now. We have to know the truth.”

They stood over Alex and Tom, still unconscious, lying on the cold floor. It was as if the mall had swallowed them whole, and now, just as mysteriously, it had spat them back out. Whatever was happening in Emberfield Mall, it wasn’t over.

But one thing was certain—they couldn’t leave until they had answers.




Chapter 23: The Final Decision
The stillness of the mall was overwhelming. With Alex and Tom unconscious and no clear answers to what had just happened, Brett and Claire felt like they were walking through a fog. Every step they took, every corner they turned, felt like it could be the last.

But they couldn’t keep going like this. They couldn’t stay. The hollow, the shadows, the strange occurrences—it was all too much.

Together, they dragged Alex and Tom out of the mall, each of them trying to steady the unconscious figures as best they could. They didn’t know where they were going, but they knew they couldn’t stay any longer. The mall had already taken enough from them.

The parking lot outside the mall felt too quiet, too empty. The storm had passed, leaving the world bathed in the unnatural silence of a place that had long since been forgotten by the living. The wind was still, and the only sound was the shuffle of their feet as they moved away from the doors.

They didn’t need to say it. Neither of them wanted to return.

The Final Layoff
The next morning, as the repair company rolled in with their trucks and equipment, Brett and Claire stood outside the mall, watching the workers begin to file in. The place was being reopened, but something in the air felt different now.

It wasn’t the same mall anymore. It wasn’t even the same world.

The repair crew set to work, patching up the broken windows, fixing the damaged areas. The fountain was being drained, the arcade machines removed from the floor, and the shattered glass replaced.

But even as the mall began to come back to life, Brett and Claire couldn’t help but feel like they’d escaped something far worse than what they’d been paid to face.

As the hours passed, they received their final paychecks from the company—a cold, empty transaction. No gratitude. No apology. Just the words that meant they were done.

“Thanks for your service,” the manager had said, looking past them, barely acknowledging the toll it had taken on them. “But we’re going to need to let you go. The company doesn’t want to pay you while the mall’s under repairs. You’re laid off.”

Brett had stared at the manager, his mind still reeling from everything they’d seen. “So we’re just... not needed anymore?”

The manager didn’t meet his eyes. “I’m afraid so. But don’t worry. The repair company will handle everything from here.”

And with that, it was over.


Brett and Claire walked away from the mall together, the sounds of the repair crew fading behind them. They didn’t look back. They didn’t need to.

Whatever had been haunting the mall, whatever had been lingering there in the dark corners, was no longer their problem. The hollow, the shadows, and the strange occurrences—they were someone else’s to deal with now.

They had given everything they had to this place. But now, it was done.

They could leave. They could go on with their lives.

And Emberfield Mall would remain just a memory—a place that no longer existed for them.

The End.

The Inevitable Question:
Do you think this makes Mira's story more tragic—that the hollow’s protection, while traumatic, is actually the best thing for her? And how does that affect her sense of self and her desire for freedom?
END OF BOOK ? WHITE CORPUS
